Top banner The World Factbook 2003 Banner Field Listing - Background Home Reference Maps Appendixes Country Background Afghanistan Afghanistan's recent history is characterized by war and civil unrest.
The Soviet Union invaded in 1979, but was forced to withdraw 10 years later by anti-Communist mujahidin forces supplied and trained by the US, Saudi Arabia, Pakistan, and others.
Fighting subsequently continued among the various mujahidin factions, giving rise to a state of warlordism that eventually spawned the Taliban.
Backed by foreign sponsors, the Taliban developed as a political force and eventually seized power.
The Taliban were able to capture most of the country, aside from Northern Alliance strongholds primarily in the northeast, until US and allied military action in support of the opposition following the 11 September 2001 terrorist attacks forced the group's downfall.
In late 2001, major leaders from the Afghan opposition groups and diaspora met in Bonn, Germany and agreed on a plan for the formulation of a new government structure that resulted in the inauguration of Hamid KARZAI as Chairman of the Afghan Interim Authority (AIA) on 22 December 2001.
The AIA held a nationwide Loya Jirga (Grand Assembly) in June 2002, and KARZAI was elected President by secret ballot of the Transitional Islamic State of Afghanistan (TISA).
The Transitional Authority has an 18-month mandate to hold a nationwide Loya Jirga to adopt a constitution and a 24-month mandate to hold nationwide elections.
In December 2002, the TISA marked the one-year anniversary of the fall of the Taliban.
In addition to occasionally violent political jockeying and ongoing military action to root out remaining terrorists and Taliban elements, the country suffers from enormous poverty, a crumbling infrastructure, and widespread land mines.
Albania Between 1990 and 1992 Albania ended 46 years of xenophobic Communist rule and established a multiparty democracy.
The transition has proven difficult as corrupt governments have tried to deal with high unemployment, a dilapidated infrastructure, widespread gangsterism, and disruptive political opponents.
International observers judged legislative elections in 2001 to be acceptable and a step toward democratic development, but identified serious deficiencies that should be addressed through reforms in the Albanian electoral code.
Algeria After a century of rule by France, Algeria became independent in 1962.
The surprising first round success of the fundamentalist FIS (Islamic Salvation Front) party in the December 1991 balloting caused the army to intervene, crack down on the FIS, and postpone the subsequent elections.
The fundamentalist response has resulted in a continuous low-grade civil conflict with the secular state apparatus, which nonetheless has allowed elections featuring pro-government and moderate religious-based parties.
The FIS's armed wing, the Islamic Salvation Army, disbanded in January 2000 and many armed militants of other groups surrendered under an amnesty program designed to promote national reconciliation.
Nevertheless, small numbers of armed militants persist in confronting government forces and carrying out isolated attacks on villages and other types of terrorist attacks.
Other concerns include Berber unrest, large-scale unemployment, a shortage of housing, and the need to diversify the petroleum-based economy.
American Samoa Settled as early as 1000 B.C., Samoa was "discovered" by European explorers in the 18th century.
International rivalries in the latter half of the 19th century were settled by an 1899 treaty in which Germany and the US divided the Samoan archipelago.
The US formally occupied its portion - a smaller group of eastern islands with the excellent harbor of Pago Pago - the following year.
Andorra For 715 years, from 1278 to 1993, Andorrans lived under a unique co-principality, ruled by the French chief of state and the Spanish bishop of Urgel.
In 1993, this feudal system was modified with the titular heads of state retained, but the government transformed into a parliamentary democracy.
Long isolated and impoverished, mountainous Andorra achieved considerable prosperity since World War II through its tourist industry.
Many immigrants (legal and illegal) are attracted to the thriving economy with its lack of income taxes.
Angola Civil war has been the norm in Angola since independence from Portugal in 1975.
A 1994 peace accord between the government and the National Union for the Total Independence of Angola (UNITA) provided for the integration of former UNITA insurgents into the government and armed forces.
A national unity government was installed in April of 1997, but serious fighting resumed in late 1998, rendering hundreds of thousands of people homeless.
Up to 1.5 million lives may have been lost in fighting over the past quarter century.
The death of insurgent leader Jonas SAVIMBI in 2002 and a subsequent cease-fire with UNITA may bode well for the country.
Anguilla Colonized by English settlers from Saint Kitts in 1650, Anguilla was administered by Great Britain until the early 19th century, when the island - against the wishes of the inhabitants - was incorporated into a single British dependency, along with Saint Kitts and Nevis.
Several attempts at separation failed.
In 1971, two years after a revolt, Anguilla was finally allowed to secede; this arrangement was formally recognized in 1980, with Anguilla becoming a separate British dependency.
Antarctica Speculation over the existence of a "southern land" was not confirmed until the early 1820s when British and American commercial operators and British and Russian national expeditions began exploring the Antarctic Peninsula region and other areas south of the Antarctic Circle.
Not until 1840 was it established that Antarctica was indeed a continent and not just a group of islands.
Several exploration "firsts" were achieved in the early 20th century.
Following World War II, there was an upsurge in scientific research on the continent.
A number of countries have set up year-round research stations on Antarctica.
Seven have made territorial claims, but no other country recognizes these claims.
In order to form a legal framework for the activities of nations on the continent, an Antarctic Treaty was negotiated that neither denies nor gives recognition to existing territorial claims; signed in 1959, it entered into force in 1961.
Antigua and Barbuda The Siboney were the first to inhabit the islands of Antigua and Barbuda in 2400 B.C., but Arawak and Carib Indians populated the islands when Columbus landed on his second voyage in 1493.
Early settlements by the Spanish and French were succeeded by the English who formed a colony in 1667.
Slavery, established to run the sugar plantations on Antigua, was abolished in 1834.
The islands became an independent state within the British Commonwealth of Nations in 1981.
Arctic Ocean The Arctic Ocean is the smallest of the world's five oceans (after the Pacific Ocean, Atlantic Ocean, Indian Ocean, and the recently delimited Southern Ocean).
The Northwest Passage (US and Canada) and Northern Sea Route (Norway and Russia) are two important seasonal waterways.
A sparse network of air, ocean, river, and land routes circumscribes the Arctic Ocean.
Argentina Following independence from Spain in 1816, Argentina experienced periods of internal political conflict between conservatives and liberals and between civilian and military factions.
After World War II, a long period of Peronist authoritarian rule and interference in subsequent governments was followed by a military junta that took power in 1976.
Democracy returned in 1983, and numerous elections since then have underscored Argentina's progress in democratic consolidation.
Armenia Armenia prides itself on being the first nation to formally adopt Christianity (early 4th century).
Despite periods of autonomy, over the centuries Armenia came under the sway of various empires including the Roman, Byzantine, Arab, Persian, and Ottoman.
It was incorporated into Russia in 1828 and the USSR in 1920.
Armenian leaders remain preoccupied by the long conflict with Muslim Azerbaijan over Nagorno-Karabakh, a primarily Armenian-populated region, assigned to Soviet Azerbaijan in the 1920s by Moscow.
Armenia and Azerbaijan began fighting over the area in 1988; the struggle escalated after both countries attained independence from the Soviet Union in 1991.
By May 1994, when a cease-fire took hold, Armenian forces held not only Nagorno-Karabakh but also a significant portion of Azerbaijan proper.
The economies of both sides have been hurt by their inability to make substantial progress toward a peaceful resolution.
Aruba Discovered and claimed for Spain in 1499, Aruba was acquired by the Dutch in 1636.
The island's economy has been dominated by three main industries.
A 19th century gold rush was followed by prosperity brought on by the opening in 1924 of an oil refinery.
The last decades of the 20th century saw a boom in the tourism industry.
Aruba seceded from the Netherlands Antilles in 1986 and became a separate, autonomous member of the Kingdom of the Netherlands.
Movement toward full independence was halted at Aruba's request in 1990.
Ashmore and Cartier Islands These uninhabited islands came under Australian authority in 1931; formal administration began two years later.
Ashmore Reef supports a rich and diverse avian and marine habitat; in 1983, it became a National Nature Reserve.
Cartier Island, a former bombing range, is now a marine reserve.
Atlantic Ocean The Atlantic Ocean is the second largest of the world's five oceans (after the Pacific Ocean, but larger than the Indian Ocean, Southern Ocean, and Arctic Ocean).
The Kiel Canal (Germany), Oresund (Denmark-Sweden), Bosporus (Turkey), Strait of Gibraltar (Morocco-Spain), and the Saint Lawrence Seaway (Canada-US) are important strategic access waterways.
The decision by the International Hydrographic Organization in the spring of 2000 to delimit a fifth world ocean, the Southern Ocean, removed the portion of the Atlantic Ocean south of 60 degrees south.
Australia Australia became a commonwealth of the British Empire in 1901.
It was able to take advantage of its natural resources to rapidly develop its agricultural and manufacturing industries and to make a major contribution to the British effort in World Wars I and II.
Long-term concerns include pollution, particularly depletion of the ozone layer, and management and conservation of coastal areas, especially the Great Barrier Reef.
A referendum to change Australia's status, from a commonwealth headed by the British monarch to a republic, was defeated in 1999.
Austria Once the center of power for the large Austro-Hungarian Empire, Austria was reduced to a small republic after its defeat in World War I. Following annexation by Nazi Germany in 1938 and subsequent occupation by the victorious Allies in 1945, Austria's status remained unclear for a decade.
A State Treaty signed in 1955 ended the occupation, recognized Austria's independence, and forbade unification with Germany.
A constitutional law that same year declared the country's "perpetual neutrality" as a condition for Soviet military withdrawal.
This neutrality, once ingrained as part of the Austrian cultural identity, has been called into question since the Soviet collapse of 1991 and Austria's entry into the European Union in 1995.
A prosperous country, Austria entered the European Monetary Union in 1999.
Azerbaijan Azerbaijan - a nation with a Turkic and majority-Muslim population - regained its independence after the collapse of the Soviet Union in 1991.
Despite a 1994 cease-fire, Azerbaijan has yet to resolve its conflict with Armenia over the Azerbaijani Nagorno-Karabakh enclave (largely Armenian populated).
Azerbaijan has lost 16% of its territory and must support some 800,000 refugees and internally displaced persons as a result of the conflict.
Corruption is ubiquitous and the promise of widespread wealth from Azerbaijan's undeveloped petroleum resources remains largely unfulfilled.
Bahamas, The Arawak Indians inhabited the islands when Christopher Columbus first set foot in the New World on San Salvador in 1492.
British settlement of the islands began in 1647; the islands became a colony in 1783.
Since attaining independence from the UK in 1973, The Bahamas have prospered through tourism and international banking and investment management.
Because of its geography, the country is a major transshipment point for illegal drugs, particularly shipments to the US, and its territory is used for smuggling illegal migrants into the US.
Bahrain Bahrain's small size and central location among Persian Gulf countries require it to play a delicate balancing act in foreign affairs among its larger neighbors.
Facing declining oil reserves, Bahrain has turned to petroleum processing and refining and has transformed itself into an international banking center.
The new amir, installed in 1999, has pushed economic and political reforms and has worked to improve relations with the Shi'a community.
In February 2001, Bahraini voters approved a referendum on the National Action Charter - the centerpiece of the amir's political liberalization program.
In February 2002, Amir HAMAD bin Isa Al Khalifa proclaimed himself king.
In October 2002, Bahrainis elected members of the lower house of Bahrain's reconstituted bicameral legislature, the National Assembly.
Baker Island The US took possession of the island in 1857, and its guano deposits were mined by US and British companies during the second half of the 19th century.
In 1935, a short-lived attempt at colonization was begun on this island - as well as on nearby Howland Island - but was disrupted by World War II and thereafter abandoned.
Presently the island is a National Wildlife Refuge run by the US Department of the Interior; a day beacon is situated near the middle of the west coast.
Bangladesh Bangladesh came into existence in 1971 when Bengali East Pakistan seceded from its union with West Pakistan.
About a third of this extremely poor country floods annually during the monsoon rainy season, hampering economic development.
Barbados The island was uninhabited when first settled by the British in 1627.
Slaves worked the sugar plantations established on the island until 1834 when slavery was abolished.
The economy remained heavily dependent on sugar, rum, and molasses production through most of the 20th century.
The gradual introduction of social and political reforms in the 1940s and 1950s led to complete independence from the UK in 1966.
In the 1990s, tourism and manufacturing surpassed the sugar industry in economic importance.
Bassas da India This atoll is a volcanic rock surrounded by reefs and is awash at high tide.
A French possession since 1897, it was placed under the administration of a commissioner residing in Reunion in 1968.
Belarus After seven decades as a constituent republic of the USSR, Belarus attained its independence in 1991.
It has retained closer political and economic ties to Russia than any of the other former Soviet republics.
Belarus and Russia signed a treaty on a two-state union on 8 December 1999 envisioning greater political and economic integration.
Although Belarus agreed to a framework to carry out the accord, serious implementation has yet to take place.
Belgium Belgium became independent from the Netherlands in 1830 and was occupied by Germany during World Wars I and II.
It has prospered in the past half century as a modern, technologically advanced European state and member of NATO and the EU.
Tensions between the Dutch-speaking Flemings of the north and the French-speaking Walloons of the south have led in recent years to constitutional amendments granting these regions formal recognition and autonomy.
Belize Territorial disputes between the UK and Guatemala delayed the independence of Belize (formerly British Honduras) until 1981.
Guatemala refused to recognize the new nation until 1992.
Tourism has become the mainstay of the economy.
The country remains plagued by high unemployment, growing involvement in the South American drug trade, and increased urban crime.
Benin Dahomey gained its independence from France in 1960; the name was changed to Benin in 1975.
From 1974 to 1989, the country was a socialist state; free elections were reestablished in 1991.
Bermuda Bermuda was first settled in 1609 by shipwrecked English colonists headed for Virginia.
Tourism to the island to escape North American winters first developed in Victorian times.
Tourism continues to be important to the island's economy, although international business has overtaken it in recent years.
Bermuda has developed into a highly successful offshore financial center.
A referendum on independence was soundly defeated in 1995.
Bhutan In 1865, Britain and Bhutan signed the Treaty of Sinchulu, under which Bhutan would receive an annual subsidy in exchange for ceding some border land.
Under British influence, a monarchy was set up in 1907; three years later, a treaty was signed whereby the British agreed not to interfere in Bhutanese internal affairs and Bhutan allowed Britain to direct its foreign affairs.
This role was assumed by independent India after 1947.
Two years later, a formal Indo-Bhutanese accord returned the areas of Bhutan annexed by the British, formalized the annual subsidies the country received, and defined India's responsibilities in defense and foreign relations.
A refugee issue of some 100,000 Bhutanese in Nepal remains unresolved; 90% of the refugees are housed in seven United Nations Office of the High Commissioner for Refugees (UNHCR) camps.
Maoist Assamese separatists from India, who have established themselves in the southeast portion of Bhutan, have drawn Indian cross-border incursions.
Bolivia Bolivia, named after independence fighter Simon BOLIVAR, broke away from Spanish rule in 1825; much of its subsequent history has consisted of a series of nearly 200 coups and counter-coups.
Comparatively democratic civilian rule was established in the 1980s, but leaders have faced difficult problems of deep-seated poverty, social unrest, and drug production.
Current goals include attracting foreign investment, strengthening the educational system, resolving disputes with coca growers over Bolivia's counterdrug efforts, continuing the privatization program, and waging an anticorruption campaign.
Bosnia and Herzegovina Bosnia and Herzegovina's declaration of sovereignty in October 1991, was followed by a declaration of independence from the former Yugoslavia on 3 March 1992 after a referendum boycotted by ethnic Serbs.
The Bosnian Serbs - supported by neighboring Serbia and Montenegro - responded with armed resistance aimed at partitioning the republic along ethnic lines and joining Serb-held areas to form a "greater Serbia."
In March 1994, Bosniaks and Croats reduced the number of warring factions from three to two by signing an agreement creating a joint Bosniak/Croat Federation of Bosnia and Herzegovina.
On 21 November 1995, in Dayton, Ohio, the warring parties initialed a peace agreement that brought to a halt three years of interethnic civil strife (the final agreement was signed in Paris on 14 December 1995).
The Dayton Agreement retained Bosnia and Herzegovina's international boundaries and created a joint multi-ethnic and democratic government.
This national government was charged with conducting foreign, economic, and fiscal policy.
Also recognized was a second tier of government comprised of two entities roughly equal in size: the Bosniak/Croat Federation of Bosnia and Herzegovina and the Bosnian Serb-led Republika Srpska (RS).
The Federation and RS governments were charged with overseeing internal functions.
In 1995-96, a NATO-led international peacekeeping force (IFOR) of 60,000 troops served in Bosnia to implement and monitor the military aspects of the agreement.
IFOR was succeeded by a smaller, NATO-led Stabilization Force (SFOR) whose mission is to deter renewed hostilities.
SFOR remains in place although troop levels were reduced to approximately 12,000 by the close of 2002.
Botswana Formerly the British protectorate of Bechuanaland, Botswana adopted its new name upon independence in 1966.
The economy, one of the most robust on the continent, is dominated by diamond mining.
Bouvet Island This uninhabited volcanic island is almost entirely covered by glaciers and is difficult to approach.
It was discovered in 1739 by a French naval officer after whom the island was named.
No claim was made until 1825, when the British flag was raised.
In 1928, the UK waived its claim in favor of Norway, which had occupied the island the previous year.
In 1971, Bouvet Island and the adjacent territorial waters were designated a nature reserve.
Since 1977, Norway has run an automated meteorological station on the island.
Brazil Following three centuries under the rule of Portugal, Brazil became an independent nation in 1822.
By far the largest and most populous country in South America, Brazil has overcome more than half a century of military intervention in the governance of the country to pursue industrial and agricultural growth and development of the interior.
Exploiting vast natural resources and a large labor pool, Brazil is today South America's leading economic power and a regional leader.
Highly unequal income distribution remains a pressing problem.
British Indian Ocean Territory Established as a territory of the UK in 1965, a number of the British Indian Ocean Territory (BIOT) islands were transferred to the Seychelles when it attained independence in 1976.
Subsequently, BIOT has consisted only of the six main island groups comprising the Chagos Archipelago.
The largest and most southerly of the islands, Diego Garcia, contains a joint UK-US naval support facility.
All of the remaining islands are uninhabited.
Former agricultural workers, earlier residents in the islands, were relocated primarily to Mauritius but also to the Seychelles, between 1967 and 1973.
In 2000, a British High Court ruling invalidated the local immigration order that had excluded them from the archipelago, but upheld the special military status of Diego Garcia.
British Virgin Islands First settled by the Dutch in 1648, the islands were annexed in 1672 by the English.
The economy is closely tied to the larger and more populous US Virgin Islands to the west; the US dollar is the legal currency.
Brunei The Sultanate of Brunei's influence peaked between the 15th and 17th centuries when its control extended over coastal areas of northwest Borneo and the southern Philippines.
Brunei subsequently entered a period of decline brought on by internal strife over royal succession, colonial expansion of European powers, and piracy.
In 1888, Brunei became a British protectorate; independence was achieved in 1984.
The same family has ruled Brunei for over six centuries.
Brunei benefits from extensive petroleum and natural gas fields, the source of one of the highest per capita GDPs in the developing world.
Bulgaria The Bulgars, a Central Asian Turkic tribe, merged with the local Slavic inhabitants in the late 7th century to form the first Bulgarian state.
In succeeding centuries, Bulgaria struggled with the Byzantine Empire to assert its place in the Balkans, but by the end of the 14th century the country was overrun by the Ottoman Turks.
Bulgaria regained its independence in 1878, but having fought on the losing side in both World Wars, it fell within the Soviet sphere of influence and became a People's Republic in 1946.
Communist domination ended in 1990, when Bulgaria held its first multiparty election since World War II and began the contentious process of moving toward political democracy and a market economy while combating inflation, unemployment, corruption, and crime.
Today, reforms and democratization keep Bulgaria on a path toward eventual integration into NATO and the EU - with which it began accession negotiations in 2000.
Burkina Faso Independence from France came to Burkina Faso (formerly Upper Volta) in 1960.
Governmental instability during the 1970s and 1980s was followed by multiparty elections in the early 1990s.
Several hundred thousand farm workers migrate south every year to Cote d'Ivoire and Ghana.
Burma Britain conquered Burma over a period of 62 years (1824-1886) and incorporated it into its Indian Empire.
Burma was administered as a province of India until 1937 when it became a separate, self-governing colony; independence outside of the Commonwealth was attained in 1948.
Gen. NE WIN dominated the government from 1962 to 1988, first as military ruler, then as president, and later as political kingmaker.
Despite multiparty elections in 1990 that resulted in the main opposition party winning a decisive victory, the ruling military junta refused to hand over power.
Key opposition leader and Nobel Peace Prize recipient AUNG SAN SUU KYI, under house arrest from 1989 to 1995, was again placed under house detention from September 2000 to May 2002 and again in May 2003; her supporters are routinely harassed or jailed.
Burundi Burundi's first democratically elected president was assassinated in October 1993 after only four months in office.
Since then, some 200,000 Burundians have perished in widespread, often intense ethnic violence between Hutu and Tutsi factions.
Hundreds of thousands have been internally displaced or have become refugees in neighboring countries.
Burundi troops, seeking to secure their borders, intervened in the conflict in the Democratic Republic of the Congo in 1998.
More recently, many of these troops have been redeployed back to Burundi to deal with periodic upsurges in rebel activity.
A new transitional government, inaugurated on 1 November 2001, was to be the first step toward holding national elections in three years.
While the Government of Burundi signed a cease-fire agreement in December 2002 with three of Burundi's four Hutu rebel groups, implementation of the agreement has been problematic and one rebel group refuses to sign on, clouding prospects for a sustainable peace.
Cambodia Following a five-year struggle, Communist Khmer Rouge forces captured Phnom Penh in 1975 and ordered the evacuation of all cities and towns; over 1 million displaced people died from execution or enforced hardships.
A 1978 Vietnamese invasion drove the Khmer Rouge into the countryside and touched off almost 20 years of fighting.
UN-sponsored elections in 1993 helped restore some semblance of normalcy as did the rapid diminishment of the Khmer Rouge in the mid-1990s.
A coalition government, formed after national elections in 1998, brought renewed political stability and the surrender of remaining Khmer Rouge forces in 1998.
Cameroon The former French Cameroon and part of British Cameroon merged in 1961 to form the present country.
Cameroon has generally enjoyed stability, which has permitted the development of agriculture, roads, and railways, as well as a petroleum industry.
Despite movement toward democratic reform, political power remains firmly in the hands of an ethnic oligarchy.
Canada A land of vast distances and rich natural resources, Canada became a self-governing dominion in 1867 while retaining ties to the British crown.
Economically and technologically the nation has developed in parallel with the US, its neighbor to the south across an unfortified border.
Its paramount political problem continues to be the relationship of the province of Quebec, with its French-speaking residents and unique culture, to the remainder of the country.
Cape Verde The uninhabited islands were discovered and colonized by the Portuguese in the 15th century; they subsequently became a trading center for African slaves and later an important coaling and resupply stop for whaling and transatlantic shipping.
Most Cape Verdeans have both African and Portuguese antecedents.
Independence was achieved in 1975.
Cayman Islands The Cayman Islands were colonized from Jamaica by the British during the 18th and 19th centuries.
Administered by Jamaica since 1863, they remained a British dependency after 1962 when the former became independent.
Central African Republic The former French colony of Ubangi-Shari became the Central African Republic upon independence in 1960.
After three tumultuous decades of misrule - mostly by military governments - civilian rule was established in 1993 and lasted for one decade.
In March 2003 a military coup deposed the civilian government of President Ange-Felix PATASSE and has since established a new government.
Chad Chad, part of France's African holdings until 1960, endured three decades of ethnic warfare as well as invasions by Libya before a semblance of peace was finally restored in 1990.
The government eventually suppressed or came to terms with most political-military groups, settled a territorial dispute with Libya on terms favorable to Chad, drafted a democratic constitution, and held multiparty presidential and National Assembly elections in 1996 and 1997, respectively.
In 1998, a new rebellion broke out in northern Chad, which continued to escalate throughout 2000.
A peace agreement, signed in January 2002 between the government and the rebels, provides for the demobilization of the rebels and their reintegration into the political system.
Despite movement toward democratic reform, power remains in the hands of a northern ethnic oligarchy.
Chile A three-year-old Marxist government was overthrown in 1973 by a dictatorial military regime led by Augusto PINOCHET, who ruled until a freely elected president was installed in 1990.
Sound economic policies, first implemented by the PINOCHET dictatorship, led to unprecedented growth in 1991-97 and have helped secure the country's commitment to democratic and representative government.
China For centuries China stood as a leading civilization, outpacing the rest of the world in the arts and sciences.
But in the 19th and early 20th centuries, China was beset by civil unrest, major famines, military defeats, and foreign occupation.
After World War II, the Communists under MAO Zedong established a dictatorship that, while ensuring China's sovereignty, imposed strict controls over everyday life and cost the lives of tens of millions of people.
After 1978, his successor DENG Xiaoping gradually introduced market-oriented reforms and decentralized economic decision-making.
Output quadrupled by 2000.
Political controls remain tight while economic controls continue to be relaxed.
Christmas Island Named in 1643 for the day of its discovery, the island was annexed and settlement was begun by the UK in 1888.
Phosphate mining began in the 1890s.
The UK transferred sovereignty to Australia in 1958.
Almost two-thirds of the island has been declared a national park.
Clipperton Island This isolated island was named for John CLIPPERTON, a pirate who made it his hideout early in the 18th century.
Annexed by France in 1855, it was seized by Mexico in 1897.
Arbitration eventually awarded the island to France, which took possession in 1935.
Cocos (Keeling) Islands There are 27 coral islands in the group.
Captain William Keeling discovered the islands in 1609, but they remained uninhabited until the 19th century.
Annexed by the UK in 1857, they were transferred to the Australian Government in 1955.
The population on the two inhabited islands generally is split between the ethnic Europeans on West Island and the ethnic Malays on Home Island.
Colombia Colombia was one of the three countries that emerged from the collapse of Gran Colombia in 1830 (the others being Ecuador and Venezuela).
A 40-year insurgent campaign to overthrow the Colombian Government escalated during the 1990s, undergirded in part by funds from the drug trade.
Although the violence is deadly and large swaths of the countryside are under guerrilla influence, the movement lacks the military strength or popular support necessary to overthrow the government.
An anti-insurgent army of paramilitaries has grown to be several thousand strong in recent years, challenging the insurgents for control of territory and illicit industries such as the drug trade and the government's ability to exert its dominion over rural areas.
While Bogota steps up efforts to reassert government control throughout the country, neighboring countries worry about the violence spilling over their borders.
Comoros Unstable Comoros has endured 19 coups or attempted coups since gaining independence from France in 1975.
In 1997, the islands of Anjouan and Moheli declared their independence from Comoros.
In 1999, military chief Col. AZALI seized power.
He pledged to resolve the secessionist crisis through a confederal arrangement named the 2000 Fomboni Accord.
In December 2001, voters approved a new constitution and presidential elections took place in the spring of 2002.
Each island in the archipelago elected its own president and a new union president was sworn in on May 26, 2002.
Congo, Democratic Republic of the Since 1997, the Democratic Republic of the Congo (DROC; formerly called Zaire) has been rent by ethnic strife and civil war, touched off by a massive inflow in 1994 of refugees from the fighting in Rwanda and Burundi.
The government of former president MOBUTU Sese Seko was toppled by a rebellion led by Laurent KABILA in May 1997; his regime was subsequently challenged by a Rwanda- and Uganda-backed rebellion in August 1998.
Troops from Zimbabwe, Angola, Namibia, Chad, and Sudan intervened to support the Kinshasa regime.
A cease-fire was signed on 10 July 1999 by the DROC, Zimbabwe, Angola, Uganda, Namibia, Rwanda, and Congolese armed rebel groups, but sporadic fighting continued.
KABILA was assassinated on 16 January 2001 and his son Joseph KABILA was named head of state ten days later.
In October 2002, the new president was successful in getting occupying Rwandan forces to withdraw from eastern Congo; two months later, an agreement was signed by all remaining warring parties to end the fighting and set up a government of national unity.
Congo, Republic of the Upon independence in 1960, the former French region of Middle Congo became the Republic of the Congo.
A quarter century of experimentation with Marxism was abandoned in 1990 and a democratically elected government installed in 1992.
A brief civil war in 1997 restored former Marxist President SASSOU-NGUESSO.
Cook Islands Named after Captain Cook, who sighted them in 1770, the islands became a British protectorate in 1888.
By 1900, administrative control was transferred to New Zealand; in 1965 residents chose self-government in free association with New Zealand.
The emigration of skilled workers to New Zealand and government deficits are continuing problems.
Coral Sea Islands Scattered over some 1 million square kilometers of ocean, the Coral Sea Islands were declared a territory of Australia in 1969.
They are uninhabited except for a small meteorological staff on the Willis Islets.
Automated weather stations, beacons, and a lighthouse occupy many other islands and reefs.
Costa Rica Costa Rica is a Central American success story: since the late 19th century, only two brief periods of violence have marred its democratic development.
Although still a largely agricultural country, it has expanded its economy to include strong technology and tourism sectors.
The standard of living is relatively high.
Land ownership is widespread.
Cote d'Ivoire Close ties to France since independence in 1960, the development of cocoa production for export, and foreign investment made Cote d'Ivoire one of the most prosperous of the tropical African states, but did not protect it from political turmoil.
On 25 December 1999, a military coup - the first ever in Cote d'Ivoire's history - overthrew the government led by President Henri Konan BEDIE.
Junta leader Robert GUEI held elections in late 2000, but excluded prominent opposition leader Alassane OUATTARA, blatantly rigged the polling results, and declared himself winner.
Popular protest forced GUEI to step aside and brought runner-up Laurent GBAGBO into power.
GBAGBO spent his first two years in office trying to consolidate power to strengthen his weak mandate, but he was unable to appease his opponents, who launched a failed coup attempt in September 2002.
Rebel forces claimed the northern half of the country and in January 2003 were granted ministerial positions in a unity government.
Several thousand French and West African troops remain in Cote d'Ivoire to maintain peace and help implement the peace accords.
Croatia In 1918, the Croats, Serbs, and Slovenes formed a kingdom known after 1929 as Yugoslavia.
Following World War II, Yugoslavia became a federal independent Communist state under the strong hand of Marshal TITO.
Although Croatia declared its independence from Yugoslavia in 1991, it took four years of sporadic, but often bitter, fighting before occupying Serb armies were mostly cleared from Croatian lands.
Under UN supervision, the last Serb-held enclave in eastern Slavonia was returned to Croatia in 1998.
Cuba Fidel CASTRO led a rebel army to victory in 1959; his iron rule has held the country together since then.
Cuba's Communist revolution, with Soviet support, was exported throughout Latin America and Africa during the 1960s, 1970s, and 1980s.
The country is now slowly recovering from a severe economic recession in 1990, following the withdrawal of former Soviet subsidies, worth $4 billion to $6 billion annually.
Cuba portrays its difficulties as the result of the US embargo in place since 1961.
Illicit migration to the US - using homemade rafts, alien smugglers, or falsified visas - is a continuing problem.
Some 2,500 Cubans attempted the crossing of the Straits of Florida in 2002; the US Coast Guard apprehended about 60% of the individuals.
Cyprus Independence from the UK was approved in 1960, with constitutional guarantees by the Greek Cypriot majority to the Turkish Cypriot minority.
In 1974, a Greek-sponsored attempt to seize the government was met by military intervention from Turkey, which soon controlled almost 40% of the island.
In 1983, the Turkish-held area declared itself the "Turkish Republic of Northern Cyprus," but it is recognized only by Turkey.
UN-led direct talks between the two sides to reach a comprehensive settlement to the division of the island began in January 2002.
Czech Republic Following the First World War, the closely related Czechs and Slovaks of the former Austro-Hungarian Empire merged to form Czechoslovakia.
During the interwar years, the new country's leaders were frequently preoccupied with meeting the demands of other ethnic minorities within the republic, most notably the Sudeten Germans and the Ruthenians (Ukrainians).
After World War II, a truncated Czechoslovakia fell within the Soviet sphere of influence.
In 1968, an invasion by Warsaw Pact troops ended the efforts of the country's leaders to liberalize Communist party rule and create "socialism with a human face."
Anti-Soviet demonstrations the following year ushered in a period of harsh repression.
With the collapse of Soviet authority in 1989, Czechoslovakia regained its freedom through a peaceful "Velvet Revolution."
On 1 January 1993, the country underwent a "velvet divorce" into its two national components, the Czech Republic and Slovakia.
Now a member of NATO, the Czech Republic has moved toward integration in world markets, a development that poses both opportunities and risks.
In December 2002, the Czech Republic was invited to join the European Union (EU).
It is expected that the Czech Republic will accede to the EU in 2004.
Denmark Once the seat of Viking raiders and later a major north European power, Denmark has evolved into a modern, prosperous nation that is participating in the general political and economic integration of Europe.
It joined NATO in 1949 and the EEC (now the EU) in 1973.
However, the country has opted out of certain elements of the European Union's Maastricht Treaty, including the European Economic and Monetary Union (EMU) and issues concerning certain justice and home affairs.
Djibouti The French Territory of the Afars and the Issas became Djibouti in 1977.
A peace accord in 2001 ended the final phases of a ten-year uprising by Afar rebels.
Dominica Dominica was the last of the Caribbean islands to be colonized by Europeans, due chiefly to the fierce resistance of the native Caribs.
France ceded possession to Great Britain in 1763, which made the island a colony in 1805.
In 1980, two years after independence, Dominica's fortunes improved when a corrupt and tyrannical administration was replaced by that of Mary Eugenia CHARLES, the first female prime minister in the Caribbean, who remained in office for 15 years.
Some 3,000 Carib Indians still living on Dominica are the only pre-Columbian population remaining in the eastern Caribbean.
Dominican Republic Explored and claimed by Columbus on his first voyage in 1492, the island of Hispaniola became a springboard for Spanish conquest of the Caribbean and the American mainland.
In 1697, Spain recognized French dominion over the western third of the island, which in 1804 became Haiti.
The remainder of the island, by then known as Santo Domingo, sought to gain its own independence in 1821, but was conquered and ruled by the Haitians for 22 years; it finally attained independence as the Dominican Republic in 1844.
A legacy of unsettled, mostly non-representative, rule for much of its subsequent history was brought to an end in 1966 when Joaquin BALAGUER became president.
He maintained a tight grip on power for most of the next 30 years when international reaction to flawed elections forced him to curtail his term in 1996.
Since then, regular competitive elections have been held in which opposition candidates have won the presidency.
The Dominican economy has had one of the fastest growth rates in the hemisphere over the past decade.
East Timor The Portuguese colony of Timor declared itself independent from Portugal on 28 November 1975 and was invaded and occupied by Indonesian forces nine days later.
It was incorporated into Indonesia in July 1976 as the province of East Timor.
A campaign of pacification followed over the next two decades, during which an estimated 100,000 to 250,000 individuals lost their lives.
On 30 August 1999, in a UN-supervised popular referendum, the people of East Timor voted for independence from Indonesia.
During 1999-2001, pro-integrationist militias - supported by Indonesia - conducted indiscriminate violence.
On 20 May 2002, East Timor was internationally recognized as an independent state and the world's newest democracy.
Ecuador The "Republic of the Equator" was one of three countries that emerged from the collapse of Gran Colombia in 1830 (the others being Colombia and Venezuela).
Between 1904 and 1942, Ecuador lost territories in a series of conflicts with its neighbors.
A border war with Peru that flared in 1995 was resolved in 1999.
Egypt The regularity and richness of the annual Nile River flood, coupled with semi-isolation provided by deserts to the east and west, allowed for the development of one of the world's great civilizations.
A unified kingdom arose circa 3200 B.C. and a series of dynasties ruled in Egypt for the next three millennia.
The last native dynasty fell to the Persians in 341 B.C., who in turn were replaced by the Greeks, Romans, and Byzantines.
It was the Arabs who introduced Islam and the Arabic language in the 7th century and who ruled for the next six centuries.
A local military caste, the Mamluks took control about 1250 and continued to govern after the conquest of Egypt by the Ottoman Turks in 1517.
Following the completion of the Suez Canal in 1869, Egypt became an important world transportation hub, but also fell heavily into debt.
Ostensibly to protect its investments, Britain seized control of Egypt's government in 1882, but nominal allegiance to the Ottoman Empire continued until 1914.
Partially independent from the UK in 1922, Egypt acquired full sovereignty following World War II.
The completion of the Aswan High Dam in 1971 and the resultant Lake Nasser have altered the time-honored place of the Nile River in the agriculture and ecology of Egypt.
A rapidly growing population (the largest in the Arab world), limited arable land, and dependence on the Nile all continue to overtax resources and stress society.
The government has struggled to ready the economy for the new millennium through economic reform and massive investment in communications and physical infrastructure.
El Salvador El Salvador achieved independence from Spain in 1821 and from the Central American Federation in 1839.
A 12-year civil war, which cost about 75,000 lives, was brought to a close in 1992 when the government and leftist rebels signed a treaty that provided for military and political reforms.
Equatorial Guinea Equatorial Guinea gained independence in 1968 after 190 years of Spanish rule.
President OBIANG NGUEM MBASOGO has ruled the tiny country, composed of a mainland portion plus five inhabited islands and one of the smallest countries on the African continent, since he seized power in a coup in 1979.
Although nominally a constitutional democracy since 1991, the 1996 and 2002 presidential elections - as well as the 1999 legislative elections - were widely seen as being flawed.
Eritrea Eritrea was awarded to Ethiopia in 1952 as part of a federation.
Ethiopia's annexation of Eritrea as a province 10 years later sparked a 30-year struggle for independence that ended in 1991 with Eritrean rebels defeating governmental forces; independence was overwhelmingly approved in a 1993 referendum.
A two-and-a-half-year border war with Ethiopia that erupted in 1998 ended under UN auspices on 12 December 2000.
Eritrea currently hosts a UN peacekeeping operation that is monitoring the border region until an international commission determines and demarcates the boundary between the two countries.
Estonia After centuries of Danish, Swedish, German, and Russian rule, Estonia attained independence in 1918.
Forcibly incorporated into the USSR in 1940, it regained its freedom in 1991, with the collapse of the Soviet Union.
Since the last Russian troops left in 1994, Estonia has been free to promote economic and political ties with Western Europe.
Estonia received invitations to join NATO and the EU in 2002.
Ethiopia Unique among African countries, the ancient Ethiopian monarchy maintained its freedom from colonial rule, one exception being the Italian occupation of 1936-41.
In 1974 a military junta, the Derg, deposed Emperor Haile SELASSIE (who had ruled since 1930) and established a socialist state.
Torn by bloody coups, uprisings, wide-scale drought, and massive refugee problems, the regime was finally toppled by a coalition of rebel forces, the Ethiopian People's Revolutionary Democratic Front (EPRDF), in 1991.
A constitution was adopted in 1994 and Ethiopia's first multiparty elections were held in 1995.
A two and a half year border war with Eritrea ended with a peace treaty on 12 December 2000.
Europa Island A French possession since 1897, the island is heavily wooded; it is the site of a small military garrison that staffs a weather station.
Falkland Islands (Islas Malvinas) Although first sighted by an English navigator in 1592, the first landing (English) did not occur until almost a century later in 1690, and the first settlement (French) was not established until 1764.
The colony was turned over to Spain two years later and the islands have since been the subject of a territorial dispute, first between Britain and Spain, then between Britain and Argentina.
The UK asserted its claim to the islands by establishing a naval garrison there in 1833.
Argentina invaded the islands on 2 April 1982.
The British responded with an expeditionary force that landed seven weeks later and after fierce fighting forced Argentine surrender on 14 June 1982.
Faroe Islands The population of the Faroe Islands is largely descended from Viking settlers who arrived in the 9th century.
The islands have been connected politically to Denmark since the 14th century.
A high degree of self-government was attained in 1948.
Fiji Fiji became independent in 1970, after nearly a century as a British colony.
Democratic rule was interrupted by two military coups in 1987, caused by concern over a government perceived as dominated by the Indian community (descendants of contract laborers brought to the islands by the British in the 19th century).
A 1990 constitution favored native Melanesian control of Fiji, but led to heavy Indian emigration; the population loss resulted in economic difficulties, but ensured that Melanesians became the majority.
Amendments enacted in 1997 made the constitution more equitable.
Free and peaceful elections in 1999 resulted in a government led by an Indo-Fijian, but a coup in May 2000 ushered in a prolonged period of political turmoil.
Parliamentary elections held in August 2001 provided Fiji with a democratically elected government and gave a mandate to the government of Prime Minister Laisenia QARASE.
Finland Finland was a province and then a grand duchy under Sweden from the 12th to the 19th centuries and an autonomous grand duchy of Russia after 1809.
It finally won its complete independence in 1917.
During World War II, it was able to successfully defend its freedom and resist invasions by the Soviet Union - albeit with some loss of territory.
In the subsequent half century, the Finns made a remarkable transformation from a farm/forest economy to a diversified modern industrial economy; per capita income is now on par with Western Europe.
As a member of the European Union, Finland was the only Nordic state to join the euro system at its initiation in January 1999.
France Although ultimately a victor in World Wars I and II, France suffered extensive losses in its empire, wealth, manpower, and rank as a dominant nation-state.
Nevertheless, France today is one of the most modern countries in the world and is a leader among European nations.
Since 1958, it has constructed a presidential democracy resistant to the instabilities experienced in earlier parliamentary democracies.
In recent years, its reconciliation and cooperation with Germany have proved central to the economic integration of Europe, including the introduction of the euro in January 2002.
At present, France is at the forefront of European states seeking to exploit the momentum of monetary union to advance the creation of a more unified and capable European defense and security apparatus.
French Guiana First settled by the French in 1604, French Guiana was the site of notorious penal settlements until 1951.
The European Space Agency launches its communication satellites from Kourou.
French Polynesia The French annexed various Polynesian island groups during the 19th century.
In September 1995, France stirred up widespread protests by resuming nuclear testing on the Mururoa atoll after a three-year moratorium.
The tests were suspended in January 1996.
French Southern and Antarctic Lands The Southern Lands consist of two archipelagos, Iles Crozet and Iles Kerguelen, and two volcanic islands, Ile Amsterdam and Ile Saint-Paul.
They contain no permanent inhabitants and are visited only by researchers studying the native fauna.
The Antarctic portion consists of "Adelie Land," a thin slice of the Antarctic continent discovered and claimed by the French in 1840.
Gabon Ruled by autocratic presidents since independence from France in 1960, Gabon introduced a multiparty system and a new constitution in the early 1990s that allowed for a more transparent electoral process and for reforms of governmental institutions.
A small population, abundant natural resources, and considerable foreign support have helped make Gabon one of the more prosperous black African countries.
Gambia, The The Gambia gained its independence from the UK in 1965; it formed a short-lived federation of Senegambia with Senegal between 1982 and 1989.
In 1991 the two nations signed a friendship and cooperation treaty.
A military coup in 1994 overthrew the president and banned political activity, but a 1996 constitution and presidential elections, followed by parliamentary balloting in 1997, completed a nominal return to civilian rule.
The country undertook another round of presidential and legislative elections in late 2001 and early 2002.
Gaza Strip The Israel-PLO Declaration of Principles on Interim Self-Government Arrangements (the DOP), signed in Washington on 13 September 1993, provided for a transitional period not exceeding five years of Palestinian interim self-government in the Gaza Strip and the West Bank.
Under the DOP, Israel agreed to transfer certain powers and responsibilities to the Palestinian Authority, which includes the Palestinian Legislative Council elected in January 1996, as part of the interim self-governing arrangements in the West Bank and Gaza Strip.
A transfer of powers and responsibilities for the Gaza Strip and Jericho took place pursuant to the Israel-PLO 4 May 1994 Cairo Agreement on the Gaza Strip and the Jericho Area and in additional areas of the West Bank pursuant to the Israel-PLO 28 September 1995 Interim Agreement, the Israel-PLO 15 January 1997 Protocol Concerning Redeployment in Hebron, the Israel-PLO 23 October 1998 Wye River Memorandum, and the 4 September 1999 Sharm el-Sheikh Agreement.
The DOP provides that Israel will retain responsibility during the transitional period for external and internal security and for public order of settlements and Israeli citizens.
Direct negotiations to determine the permanent status of Gaza and West Bank had begun in September 1999 after a three-year hiatus, but have been derailed by a second intifadah that broke out in September 2000.
The resulting widespread violence in the West Bank and Gaza Strip, Israel's military response, and instability within the Palestinian Authority continue to undermine progress toward a permanent agreement.
Georgia Georgia was absorbed into the Russian Empire in the 19th century.
Independent for three years (1918-1921) following the Russian revolution, it was forcibly incorporated into the USSR until the Soviet Union dissolved in 1991.
Ethnic separation in Abkhazia and South Ossetia, poor governance, and Russian military bases deny the government effective control over the entirety of the state's internationally recognized territory.
Despite myriad problems, progress on market reforms and democratization support the country's goal of greater integration with Western political, economic, and security institutions.
Germany As Europe's largest economy and most populous nation, Germany remains a key member of the continent's economic, political, and defense organizations.
European power struggles immersed the country in two devastating World Wars in the first half of the 20th century and left the country occupied by the victorious Allied powers of the US, UK, France, and the Soviet Union in 1945.
With the advent of the Cold War, two German states were formed in 1949: the western Federal Republic of Germany (FRG) and the eastern German Democratic Republic (GDR).
The democratic FRG embedded itself in key Western economic and security organizations, the EC, which became the EU, and NATO, while the Communist GDR was on the front line of the Soviet-led Warsaw Pact.
The decline of the USSR and the end of the Cold War allowed for German unification in 1990.
Since then, Germany has expended considerable funds to bring eastern productivity and wages up to western standards.
In January 2002, Germany and 11 other EU countries introduced a common European currency, the euro.
Ghana Formed from the merger of the British colony of the Gold Coast and the Togoland trust territory, Ghana in 1957 became the first country in colonial Africa to gain its independence.
A long series of coups resulted in the suspension of the constitution in 1981 and the banning of political parties.
A new constitution, restoring multiparty politics, was approved in 1992.
Lt. Jerry RAWLINGS, head of state since 1981, won presidential elections in 1992 and 1996, but was constitutionally prevented from running for a third term in 2000.
He was succeeded by John KUFUOR, who defeated former Vice President Atta MILLS in a free and fair election.
Gibraltar Strategically important, Gibraltar was ceded to Great Britain by Spain in the 1713 Treaty of Utrecht; the British garrison was formally declared a colony in 1830.
In referendums held in 1967 and 2002, Gibraltarians ignored Spanish pressure and voted overwhelmingly to remain a British dependency.
Glorioso Islands A French possession since 1892, the Glorioso Islands are composed of two lushly vegetated coral islands (Ile Glorieuse and Ile du Lys) and three rock islets.
A military garrison operates a weather and radio station on Ile Glorieuse.
Greece Greece achieved its independence from the Ottoman Empire in 1829.
During the second half of the 19th century and the first half of the 20th century, it gradually added neighboring islands and territories, most with Greek-speaking populations.
Following the defeat of Communist rebels in 1949, Greece joined NATO in 1952.
A military dictatorship, which in 1967 suspended many political liberties and forced the king to flee the country, lasted seven years.
Democratic elections in 1974 and a referendum created a parliamentary republic and abolished the monarchy; Greece joined the European Community or EC in 1981 (which became the EU in 1992).
Greenland The world's largest non-continental island, about 81% ice-capped, Greenland was granted self-government in 1978 by the Danish parliament.
The law went into effect the following year.
Denmark continues to exercise control of Greenland's foreign affairs.
Grenada One of the smallest independent countries in the western hemisphere, Grenada was seized by a Marxist military council on 19 October 1983.
Six days later the island was invaded by US forces and those of six other Caribbean nations, which quickly captured the ringleaders and their hundreds of Cuban advisers.
Free elections were reinstituted the following year.
Guadeloupe Guadeloupe has been a French possession since 1635.
The island of Saint Martin is shared with the Netherlands; its southern portion is named Sint Maarten and is part of the Netherlands Antilles and its northern portion is named Saint-Martin and is part of Guadeloupe Guam Guam was ceded to the US by Spain in 1898.
Captured by the Japanese in 1941, it was retaken by the US three years later.
The military installation on the island is one of the most strategically important US bases in the Pacific.
Guatemala Guatemala was freed of Spanish colonial rule in 1821.
During the second half of the 20th century, it experienced a variety of military and civilian governments as well as a 36-year guerrilla war.
In 1996, the government signed a peace agreement formally ending the conflict, which had led to the death of more than 100,000 people and had created some 1 million refugees.
Guernsey The island of Guernsey and the other Channel Islands represent the last remnants of the medieval Dukedom of Normandy, which held sway in both France and England.
The islands were the only British soil occupied by German troops in World War II.
Guinea Independent from France since 1958, Guinea did not hold democratic elections until 1993 when Gen. Lansana CONTE (head of the military government) was elected president of the civilian government.
He was reelected in 1998.
Unrest in Sierra Leone has spilled over into Guinea, threatening stability and creating a humanitarian emergency.
Guinea-Bissau In 1994, 20 years after independence from Portugal, the country's first multiparty legislative and presidential elections were held.
An army uprising that triggered a bloody civil war in 1998 created hundreds of thousands of displaced persons.
A military junta ousted the president in May 1999.
An interim government turned over power in February 2000 when opposition leader Kumba YALA took office following two rounds of transparent presidential elections.
Guinea-Bissau's transition back to democracy will be complicated by its crippled economy, devastated in the civil war.
Guyana Originally a Dutch colony in the 17th century, by 1815 Guyana had become a British possession.
The abolition of slavery led to black settlement of urban areas and the importation of indentured servants from India to work the sugar plantations.
This ethnocultural divide has persisted and has led to turbulent politics.
Guyana achieved independence from the UK in 1966, but until the early 1990s it was ruled mostly by socialist-oriented governments.
In 1992, Cheddi JAGAN was elected president, in what is considered the country's first free and fair election since independence.
Upon his death five years later, he was succeeded by his wife Janet, who resigned in 1999 due to poor health.
Her successor, Bharrat JAGDEO, was reelected in 2001.
Haiti The native Arawak Amerindians - who inhabited the island of Hispaniola when it was discovered by Columbus in 1492 - were virtually annihilated by Spanish settlers within 25 years.
In the early 17th century, the French established a presence on Hispaniola, and in 1697, Spain ceded to the French the western third of the island - Haiti.
The French colony, based on forestry and sugar-related industries, became one of the wealthiest in the Caribbean, but only through the heavy importation of African slaves and considerable environmental degradation.
In the late 18th century, Haiti's nearly half million slaves revolted under Toussaint L'OUVERTURE and after a prolonged struggle, became the first black republic to declare its independence in 1804.
Haiti has been plagued by political violence for most of its history since then, and it is now one of the poorest countries in the Western Hemisphere.
Over three decades of dictatorship followed by military rule ended in 1990 when Jean-Bertrand ARISTIDE was elected president.
Most of his term was usurped by a military takeover, but he was able to return to office in 1994 and oversee the installation of a close associate to the presidency in 1996.
ARISTIDE won a second term as president in 2000, and took office early in 2001.
However, a political crisis stemming from fraudulent legislative elections in 2000 has not yet been resolved.
Heard Island and McDonald Islands These uninhabited, barren, sub-Antarctic islands were transferred from the UK to Australia in 1947.
Populated by large numbers of seal and bird species, the islands have been designated a nature preserve.
Holy See (Vatican City) Popes in their secular role ruled portions of the Italian peninsula for more than a thousand years until the mid 19th century, when many of the Papal States were seized by the newly united Kingdom of Italy.
In 1870, the pope's holdings were further circumscribed when Rome itself was annexed.
Disputes between a series of "prisoner" popes and Italy were resolved in 1929 by three Lateran Treaties, which established the independent state of Vatican City and granted Roman Catholicism special status in Italy.
In 1984, a concordat between the Holy See and Italy modified certain of the earlier treaty provisions, including the primacy of Roman Catholicism as the Italian state religion.
Present concerns of the Holy See include the failing health of Pope John Paul II, interreligious dialogue and reconciliation, and the application of church doctrine in an era of rapid change and globalization.
About 1 billion people worldwide profess the Catholic faith.
Honduras Part of Spain's vast empire in the New World, Honduras became an independent nation in 1821.
After two and one-half decades of mostly military rule, a freely elected civilian government came to power in 1982.
During the 1980s, Honduras proved a haven for anti-Sandinista contras fighting the Marxist Nicaraguan Government and an ally to Salvadoran Government forces fighting against leftist guerrillas.
The country was devastated by Hurricane Mitch in 1998, which killed about 5,600 people and caused almost $1 billion in damage.
Hong Kong Occupied by the UK in 1841, Hong Kong was formally ceded by China the following year; various adjacent lands were added later in the 19th century.
Pursuant to an agreement signed by China and the UK on 19 December 1984, Hong Kong became the Hong Kong Special Administrative Region (SAR) of China on 1 July 1997.
In this agreement, China has promised that, under its "one country, two systems" formula, China's socialist economic system will not be imposed on Hong Kong and that Hong Kong will enjoy a high degree of autonomy in all matters except foreign and defense affairs for the next 50 years.
Howland Island Discovered by the US early in the 19th century, the island was officially claimed by the US in 1857.
Both US and British companies mined for guano until about 1890.
Earhart Light is a day beacon near the middle of the west coast that was partially destroyed during World War II, but has since been rebuilt; it is named in memory of the famed aviatrix Amelia EARHART.
The island is administered by the US Department of the Interior as a National Wildlife Refuge.
Hungary Hungary was part of the polyglot Austro-Hungarian Empire, which collapsed during World War I.
The country fell under Communist rule following World War II.
In 1956, a revolt and announced withdrawal from the Warsaw Pact were met with a massive military intervention by Moscow.
Under the leadership of Janos KADAR in 1968, Hungary began liberalizing its economy, introducing so-called "goulash Communism."
Hungary held its first multiparty elections in 1990 and initiated a free market economy.
It joined NATO in 1999 and is scheduled to accede to the EU along with nine other states on 1 May 2004.
In an April 2003 referendum, 84 percent voted in favor of joining the EU. Iceland Settled by Norwegian and Celtic (Scottish and Irish) immigrants during the late 9th and 10th centuries A.D., Iceland boasts the world's oldest functioning legislative assembly, the Althing, established in 930.
Independent for over 300 years, Iceland was subsequently ruled by Norway and Denmark.
Fallout from the Askja volcano of 1875 devastated the Icelandic economy and caused widespread famine.
Over the next quarter century, 20% of the island's population emigrated, mostly to Canada and the US.
Limited home rule from Denmark was granted in 1874 and complete independence attained in 1944.
Literacy, longevity, income, and social cohesion are first-rate by world standards.
India The Indus Valley civilization, one of the oldest in the world, goes back at least 5,000 years.
Aryan tribes from the northwest invaded about 1500 B.C.; their merger with the earlier inhabitants created the classical Indian culture.
Arab incursions starting in the 8th century and Turkish in 12th were followed by European traders, beginning in the late 15th century.
By the 19th century, Britain had assumed political control of virtually all Indian lands.
Nonviolent resistance to British colonialism under Mohandas GANDHI and Jawaharlal NEHRU led to independence in 1947.
The subcontinent was divided into the secular state of India and the smaller Muslim state of Pakistan.
A third war between the two countries in 1971 resulted in East Pakistan becoming the separate nation of Bangladesh.
Fundamental concerns in India include the ongoing dispute with Pakistan over Kashmir, massive overpopulation, environmental degradation, extensive poverty, and ethnic and religious strife, all this despite impressive gains in economic investment and output.
Indian Ocean The Indian Ocean is the third largest of the world's five oceans (after the Pacific Ocean and Atlantic Ocean, but larger than the Southern Ocean and Arctic Ocean).
Four critically important access waterways are the Suez Canal (Egypt), Bab el Mandeb (Djibouti-Yemen), Strait of Hormuz (Iran-Oman), and Strait of Malacca (Indonesia-Malaysia).
The decision by the International Hydrographic Organization in the spring of 2000 to delimit a fifth ocean, the Southern Ocean, removed the portion of the Indian Ocean south of 60 degrees south.
Indonesia Indonesia is the world's largest archipelago; it achieved independence from the Netherlands in 1949.
Current issues include: alleviating widespread poverty, implementing IMF-mandated reforms of the banking sector, effecting a transition to a popularly-elected government after four decades of authoritarianism, addressing charges of cronyism and corruption, holding the military and police accountable for human rights violations, and resolving growing separatist pressures in Aceh and Papua.
Iran Known as Persia until 1935, Iran became an Islamic republic in 1979 after the ruling shah was forced into exile.
Conservative clerical forces established a theocratic system of government with ultimate political authority vested in a learned religious scholar.
A group of Iranian students seized the US Embassy in Tehran on 4 November 1979 and held it until 20 January 1981.
During 1980-88, Iran fought a bloody, indecisive war with Iraq over disputed territory.
Over the past decade, popular dissatisfaction with the government, driven by demographic changes, restrictive social policies, and poor economic conditions, has created a powerful and enduring pressure for political reform.
Iraq Formerly part of the Ottoman Empire, Iraq became an independent kingdom in 1932.
A "republic" was proclaimed in 1958, but in actuality a series of military strongmen have ruled the country since then, the latest being SADDAM Husayn.
Territorial disputes with Iran led to an inconclusive and costly eight-year war (1980-88).
In August 1990, Iraq seized Kuwait, but was expelled by US-led, UN coalition forces during the Gulf War of January-February 1991.
Following Kuwait's liberation, the UN Security Council (UNSC) required Iraq to scrap all weapons of mass destruction and long-range missiles and to allow UN verification inspections.
Continued Iraqi noncompliance with UNSC resolutions during the past 12 years resulted in the US-led invasion of Iraq in March 2003 and the ouster of the SADDAM Husayn regime.
Coalition forces remain in Iraq, helping to restore degraded infrastructure and facilitating the establishment of a freely elected government.
Ireland Celtic tribes settled on the island in the 4th century B.C.
Invasions by Norsemen that began in the late 8th century were finally ended when King Brian BORU defeated the Danes in 1014.
English invasions began in the 12th century and set off more than seven centuries of Anglo-Irish struggle marked by fierce rebellions and harsh repressions.
A failed 1916 Easter Monday Rebellion touched off several years of guerrilla warfare that in 1921 resulted in independence from the UK for 26 southern counties; six northern (Ulster) counties remained part of the United Kingdom.
In 1948 Ireland withdrew from the British Commonwealth; it joined the European Community in 1973.
Irish governments have sought the peaceful unification of Ireland and have cooperated with Britain against terrorist groups.
A peace settlement for Northern Ireland, known as the Good Friday Agreement and approved in 1998, is currently being implemented.
Israel Following World War II, the British withdrew from their mandate of Palestine, and the UN partitioned the area into Arab and Jewish states, an arrangement rejected by the Arabs.
Subsequently, the Israelis defeated the Arabs in a series of wars without ending the deep tensions between the two sides.
The territories occupied by Israel since the 1967 war are not included in the Israel country profile, unless otherwise noted.
On 25 April 1982, Israel withdrew from the Sinai pursuant to the 1979 Israel-Egypt Peace Treaty.
Outstanding territorial and other disputes with Jordan were resolved in the 26 October 1994 Israel-Jordan Treaty of Peace.
In addition, on 25 May 2000, Israel withdrew unilaterally from southern Lebanon, which it had occupied since 1982.
In keeping with the framework established at the Madrid Conference in October 1991, bilateral negotiations were conducted between Israel and Palestinian representatives (from the Israeli-occupied West Bank and Gaza Strip) and Syria to achieve a permanent settlement.
But progress toward a permanent status agreement has been undermined by the outbreak of Palestinian-Israeli violence since September 2000.
Italy Italy became a nation-state in 1861 when the city-states of the peninsula, along with Sardinia and Sicily, were united under King Victor EMMANUEL.
An era of parliamentary government came to a close in the early 1920s when Benito MUSSOLINI established a Fascist dictatorship.
His disastrous alliance with Nazi Germany led to Italy's defeat in World War II.
A democratic republic replaced the monarchy in 1946 and economic revival followed.
Italy was a charter member of NATO and the European Economic Community (EEC).
It has been at the forefront of European economic and political unification, joining the European Monetary Union in 1999.
Persistent problems include illegal immigration, organized crime, corruption, high unemployment, and the low incomes and technical standards of southern Italy compared with the prosperous north.
Jamaica Jamaica gained full independence within the British Commonwealth in 1962.
Deteriorating economic conditions during the 1970s led to recurrent violence and a dropoff in tourism.
Elections in 1980 saw the democratic socialists voted out of office.
Subsequent governments have been open market oriented.
Political violence marred elections during the 1990s.
Jan Mayen This desolate, mountainous island was named after a Dutch whaling captain who indisputably discovered it in 1614 (earlier claims are inconclusive).
Visited only occasionally by seal hunters and trappers over the following centuries, the island came under Norwegian sovereignty in 1929.
The long dormant Haakon VII Toppen/Beerenberg volcano resumed activity in 1970; it is the northernmost active volcano on earth.
Japan While retaining its time-honored culture, Japan rapidly absorbed Western technology during the late 19th and early 20th centuries.
After its defeat in World War II, Japan recovered to become an economic power and a staunch ally of the US.
While the emperor retains his throne as a symbol of national unity, actual power rests in networks of powerful politicians, bureaucrats, and business executives.
The economy experienced a major slowdown starting in the 1990s following three decades of unprecedented growth.
Jarvis Island First discovered by the British in 1821, the uninhabited island was annexed by the US in 1858, but abandoned in 1879 after tons of guano had been removed.
The UK annexed the island in 1889, but never carried out plans for further exploitation.
The US occupied and reclaimed the island in 1935.
Abandoned after World War II, the island is currently a National Wildlife Refuge administered by the US Department of the Interior; a day beacon is situated near the middle of the west coast.
Jersey The island of Jersey and the other Channel Islands represent the last remnants of the medieval Dukedom of Normandy that held sway in both France and England.
These islands were the only British soil occupied by German troops in World War II.
Johnston Atoll Both the US and the Kingdom of Hawaii annexed Johnston Atoll in 1858, but it was the US that mined the guano deposits until the late 1880s.
The US Navy took over the atoll in 1934, and subsequently the US Air Force assumed control in 1948.
The site was used for high-altitude nuclear tests in the 1950s and 1960s, and until late in 2000 the atoll was maintained as a storage and disposal site for chemical weapons.
Munitions destruction is now complete.
Cleanup and closure of the facility is progressing, with completion anticipated in 2004.
Jordan For most of its history since independence from British administration in 1946, Jordan was ruled by King HUSSEIN (1953-99).
A pragmatic ruler, he successfully navigated competing pressures from the major powers (US, USSR, and UK), various Arab states, Israel, and a large internal Palestinian population, through several wars and coup attempts.
In 1989 he resumed parliamentary elections and gradually permitted political liberalization; in 1994 a formal peace treaty was signed with Israel.
King ABDALLAH II - the eldest son of King HUSSEIN and Princess MUNA - assumed the throne following his father's death in February 1999.
Since then, he has consolidated his power and established his domestic priorities, including an aggressive economic reform program.
Jordan acceded to the World Trade Organization in January 2000, and signed free trade agreements with the United States in 2000, and with the European Free Trade Association in 2001.
Juan de Nova Island Named after a famous 15th century Spanish navigator and explorer, the island has been a French possession since 1897.
It has been exploited for its guano and phosphate.
Presently a small military garrison oversees a meteorological station.
Kazakhstan Native Kazakhs, a mix of Turkic and Mongol nomadic tribes who migrated into the region in the 13th century, were rarely united as a single nation.
The area was conquered by Russia in the 18th century and Kazakhstan became a Soviet Republic in 1936.
During the 1950s and 1960s agricultural "Virgin Lands" program, Soviet citizens were encouraged to help cultivate Kazakhstan's northern pastures.
This influx of immigrants (mostly Russians, but also some other deported nationalities) skewed the ethnic mixture and enabled non-Kazakhs to outnumber natives.
Independence has caused many of these newcomers to emigrate.
Current issues include: developing a cohesive national identity; expanding the development of the country's vast energy resources and exporting them to world markets; achieving a sustainable economic growth outside the oil, gas, and mining sectors; and strengthening relations with neighboring states and other foreign powers.
Kenya Founding president and liberation struggle icon Jomo KENYATTA led Kenya from independence until his death in 1978, when President Daniel Toroitich arap MOI took power in a constitutional succession.
The country was a de facto one-party state from 1969 until 1982 when the ruling Kenya African National Union (KANU) made itself the sole legal party in Kenya.
MOI acceded to internal and external pressure for political liberalization in late 1991.
The ethnically fractured opposition failed to dislodge KANU from power in elections in 1992 and 1997, which were marred by violence and fraud, but are viewed as having generally reflected the will of the Kenyan people.
President MOI stepped down in December of 2002 following fair and peaceful elections.
Mwai KIBAKI, running as the candidate of the multiethnic, united opposition group, the National Rainbow Coalition, defeated KANU candidate Uhuru KENYATTA and assumed the presidency following a campaign centered on an anticorruption platform.
Kingman Reef The US annexed the reef in 1922.
Its sheltered lagoon served as a way station for flying boats on Hawaii-to-American Samoa flights during the late 1930s.
There are no terrestrial plants on the reef, which is frequently awash, but it does support abundant and diverse marine fauna and flora.
In 2001, the waters surrounding the reef out to 12 NM around the reef were designated a US National Wildlife Refuge.
Kiribati The Gilbert Islands were granted self-rule by the UK in 1971 and complete independence in 1979 under the new name of Kiribati.
The US relinquished all claims to the sparsely inhabited Phoenix and Line Island groups in a 1979 treaty of friendship with Kiribati.
Korea, North Following World War II, Korea was split, with the northern half coming under Communist domination and the southern portion becoming Western-oriented.
KIM Chong-il has ruled North Korea since his father and the country's founder, president KIM Il-song, died in 1994.
After decades of mismanagement, the North relies heavily on international food aid to feed its population while continuing to expend resources to maintain an army of about 1 million.
North Korea's long-range missile development and research into nuclear, chemical, and biological weapons and massive conventional armed forces are of major concern to the international community.
In December 2002, North Korea repudiated a 1994 agreement that shut down its nuclear reactors and expelled UN monitors, further raising fears it would produce nuclear weapons.
Korea, South After World War II, a republic was set up in the southern half of the Korean Peninsula while a Communist-style government was installed in the north.
During the Korean War (1950-1953), US and other UN forces intervened to defend South Korea from North Korean attacks supported by the Chinese.
An armistice was signed in 1953, splitting the Peninsula along a demilitarized zone at about the 38th parallel.
Thereafter, South Korea achieved rapid economic growth with per capita income rising to roughly 20 times the level of North Korea.
South Korea has maintained its commitment to democratize its political processes.
In June 2000, a historic first North-South summit took place between the South's President KIM Dae-jung and the North's leader KIM Chong-il. Kuwait Britain oversaw foreign relations and defense for the ruling Kuwaiti AL-SABAH dynasty from 1899 until independence in 1961.
Kuwait was attacked and overrun by Iraq on 2 August 1990.
Following several weeks of aerial bombardment, a US-led, UN coalition began a ground assault on 23 February 1991 that liberated Kuwait in four days.
Kuwait spent more than $5 billion to repair oil infrastructure damaged during 1990-91.
Kyrgyzstan A Central Asian country of incredible natural beauty and proud nomadic traditions, Kyrgyzstan was annexed by Russia in 1864; it achieved independence from the Soviet Union in 1991.
Current concerns include: privatization of state-owned enterprises, expansion of democracy and political freedoms, interethnic relations, and combating terrorism.
Laos In 1975, the Communist Pathet Lao took control of the government, ending a six-century-old monarchy.
Initial closer ties to Vietnam and socialization were replaced with a gradual return to private enterprise, a liberalization of foreign investment laws, and the admission into ASEAN in 1997.
Latvia After a brief period of independence between the two World Wars, Latvia was annexed by the USSR in 1940.
It reestablished its independence in 1991 following the breakup of the Soviet Union.
Although the last Russian troops left in 1994, the status of the Russian minority (some 30% of the population) remains of concern to Moscow.
Latvia continues to revamp its economy for eventual integration into various Western European political and economic institutions and was invited to join NATO and the EU in 2002.
Lebanon Lebanon has made progress toward rebuilding its political institutions since 1991 and the end of the devastating 16-year civil war.
Under the Ta'if Accord - the blueprint for national reconciliation - the Lebanese have established a more equitable political system, particularly by giving Muslims a greater say in the political process while institutionalizing sectarian divisions in the government.
Since the end of the war, the Lebanese have conducted several successful elections, most of the militias have been weakened or disbanded, and the Lebanese Armed Forces (LAF) have extended central government authority over about two-thirds of the country.
Hizballah, the radical Shi'a party, retains its weapons.
Syria maintains about 16,000 troops in Lebanon, based mainly east of Beirut and in the Bekaa Valley.
Syria's troop deployment was legitimized by the Arab League during Lebanon's civil war and in the Ta'if Accord.
Damascus justifies its continued military presence in Lebanon by citing Beirut's requests and the failure of the Lebanese Government to implement all of the constitutional reforms in the Ta'if Accord.
Israel's withdrawal from its security zone in southern Lebanon in May 2000, however, has emboldened some Lebanese Christians and Druze to demand that Syria withdraw its forces as well.
Lesotho Basutoland was renamed the Kingdom of Lesotho upon independence from the UK in 1966.
King MOSHOESHOE was exiled in 1990.
Constitutional government was restored in 1993 after 23 years of military rule.
In 1998, violent protests and a military mutiny following a contentious election prompted a brief but bloody South African military intervention.
Constitutional reforms have since restored political stability; peaceful parliamentary elections were held in 2002.
Liberia Eight years of civil strife were brought to a close in 1997 when free and open presidential and legislative elections were held.
President TAYLOR now holds strong executive power with no real political opposition.
Years of fighting, coupled with the flight of most businesses, have disrupted formal economic activity.
A still unsettled domestic security situation has slowed the process of rebuilding the social and economic structure of this war-torn country.
In 2001, the UN imposed sanctions on Liberian diamonds, along with an arms embargo and a travel ban on government officials, for Liberia's support of the rebel insurgency in Sierra Leone.
Renewed rebel activity has further eroded stability and economic activity.
A regional peace initiative commenced in the spring of 2003 but was disrupted by the Special Court for Sierra Leone (SCSL) indictment of President TAYLOR on war crimes charges.
Libya Since he took power in a 1969 military coup, Col. Muammar Abu Minyar al-QADHAFI has espoused his own political system - a combination of socialism and Islam - which he calls the Third International Theory.
Viewing himself as a revolutionary leader, he used oil funds during the 1970s and 1980s to promote his ideology outside Libya, even supporting subversives and terrorists abroad to hasten the end of Marxism and capitalism.
Libyan military adventures failed, e.g., the prolonged foray of Libyan troops into the Aozou Strip in northern Chad was finally repulsed in 1987.
Libyan support for terrorism decreased after UN sanctions were imposed in 1992.
Those sanctions were suspended in April 1999.
Liechtenstein The Principality of Liechtenstein was established within the Holy Roman Empire in 1719; it became a sovereign state in 1806.
Until the end of World War I, it was closely tied to Austria, but the economic devastation caused by that conflict forced Liechtenstein to enter into a customs and monetary union with Switzerland.
Since World War II (in which Liechtenstein remained neutral), the country's low taxes have spurred outstanding economic growth.
However, shortcomings in banking regulatory oversight have resulted in concerns about the use of the financial institutions for money laundering.
Lithuania Independent between the two World Wars, Lithuania was annexed by the USSR in 1940.
On 11 March 1990, Lithuania became the first of the Soviet republics to declare its independence, but this proclamation was not generally recognized until September of 1991 (following the abortive coup in Moscow).
The last Russian troops withdrew in 1993.
Lithuania subsequently has restructured its economy for eventual integration into Western European institutions and was invited to join NATO and the EU in 2002.
Luxembourg Founded in 963, Luxembourg became a grand duchy in 1815 and an independent state under the Netherlands.
It lost more than half of its territory to Belgium in 1839, but gained a larger measure of autonomy.
Full independence was attained in 1867.
Overrun by Germany in both World Wars, it ended its neutrality in 1948 when it entered into the Benelux Customs Union and when it joined NATO the following year.
In 1957, Luxembourg became one of the six founding countries of the European Economic Community (later the European Union) and in 1999 it joined the euro currency area.
Macau Colonized by the Portuguese in the 16th century, Macau was the first European settlement in the Far East.
Pursuant to an agreement signed by China and Portugal on 13 April 1987, Macau became the Macau Special Administrative Region (SAR) of China on 20 December 1999.
China has promised that, under its "one country, two systems" formula, China's socialist economic system will not be practiced in Macau and that Macau will enjoy a high degree of autonomy in all matters except foreign and defense affairs for the next 50 years.
Macedonia, The Former Yugoslav Republic of International recognition of The Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia's (F.Y.R.O.M.) independence from Yugoslavia in 1991 was delayed by Greece's objection to the new state's use of what it considered a Hellenic name and symbols.
Greece finally lifted its trade blockade in 1995, and the two countries agreed to normalize relations, despite continued disagreement over F.Y.R.O.M.'s use of "Macedonia."
F.Y.R.O.M.'s large Albanian minority, an ethnic Albanian armed insurgency in F.Y.R.O.M. in 2001, and the status of neighboring Kosovo continue to be sources of ethnic tension.
Madagascar Formerly an independent kingdom, Madagascar became a French colony in 1886, but regained its independence in 1960.
During 1992-93, free presidential and National Assembly elections were held, ending 17 years of single-party rule.
In 1997, in the second presidential race, Didier RATSIRAKA, the leader during the 1970s and 1980s, was returned to the presidency.
The 2001 presidential election was contested between the followers of Didier RATSIRAKA and Marc RAVALOMANANA, nearly causing secession of half of the country.
In April 2002, the High Constitutional Court announced RAVALOMANANA the winner.
Malawi Established in 1891, the British protectorate of Nyasaland became the independent nation of Malawi in 1964.
After three decades of one-party rule, the country held multiparty elections in 1994 under a provisional constitution, which took full effect the following year.
National multiparty elections were held again in 1999.
Malaysia Malaysia was formed in 1963 through a federation of the former British colonies of Malaya and Singapore, including the East Malaysian states of Sabah and Sarawak on the northern coast of Borneo.
The first several years of the country's history were marred by Indonesian efforts to control Malaysia, Philippine claims to Sabah, and Singapore's secession from the federation in 1965.
Maldives The Maldives were long a sultanate, first under Dutch and then under British protection.
They became a republic in 1968, three years after independence.
Tourism and fishing are being developed on the archipelago.
Mali The Sudanese Republic and Senegal became independent of France in 1960 as the Mali Federation.
When Senegal withdrew after only a few months, what formerly made up the Sudanese Republic was renamed Mali.
Rule by dictatorship was brought to a close in 1991 with a transitional government and in 1992 when Mali's first democratic presidential election was held.
After his reelection in 1997, President Alpha KONARE continued to push through political and economic reforms and to fight corruption.
In keeping with Mali's two-term constitutional limit, he stepped down in 2002 and was succeeded by Amadou TOURE.
Malta Great Britain formally acquired possession of Malta in 1814.
The island staunchly supported the UK through both World Wars and remained in the Commonwealth when it became independent in 1964.
A decade later Malta became a republic.
Since about the mid-1980s, the island has become a freight transshipment point, financial center, and tourist destination.
It is an official candidate for EU membership.
Man, Isle of Part of the Norwegian Kingdom of the Hebrides until the 13th century when it was ceded to Scotland, the isle came under the British crown in 1765.
Current concerns include reviving the almost extinct Manx Celtic language.
Marshall Islands After almost four decades under US administration as the easternmost part of the UN Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, the Marshall Islands attained independence in 1986 under a Compact of Free Association.
Compensation claims continue as a result of US nuclear testing on some of the atolls between 1947 and 1962.
The Marshall Islands have been home to the US Army Base Kwajalein (USAKA) since 1964.
Martinique Colonized by France in 1635, the island has subsequently remained a French possession except for three brief periods of foreign occupation.
Mauritania Independent from France in 1960, Mauritania annexed the southern third of the former Spanish Sahara (now Western Sahara) in 1976, but relinquished it after three years of raids by the Polisario guerrilla front seeking independence for the territory.
Opposition parties were legalized and a new constitution approved in 1991.
Two multiparty presidential elections since then were widely seen as flawed, but October 2001 legislative and municipal elections were generally free and open.
Mauritania remains, in reality, a one-party state.
The country continues to experience ethnic tensions between its black minority population and the dominant Maur (Arab-Berber) populace.
Mauritius Discovered by the Portuguese in 1505, Mauritius was subsequently held by the Dutch, French, and British before independence was attained in 1968.
A stable democracy with regular free elections and a positive human rights record, the country has attracted considerable foreign investment and has earned one of Africa's highest per capita incomes.
Recent poor weather and declining sugar prices have slowed economic growth, leading to some protests over standards of living in the Creole community.
Mayotte Mayotte was ceded to France along with the other islands of the Comoros group in 1843.
It was the only island in the archipelago that voted in 1974 to retain its link with France and forego independence.
Mexico The site of advanced Amerindian civilizations, Mexico came under Spanish rule for three centuries before achieving independence early in the 19th century.
A devaluation of the peso in late 1994 threw Mexico into economic turmoil, triggering the worst recession in over half a century.
The nation continues to make an impressive recovery.
Ongoing economic and social concerns include low real wages, underemployment for a large segment of the population, inequitable income distribution, and few advancement opportunities for the largely Amerindian population in the impoverished southern states.
Elections held in July 2000 marked the first time since the 1910 Mexican Revolution that the opposition defeated the party in government, the Institutional Revolutionary Party (PRI).
Vicente FOX of the National Action Party (PAN) was sworn in on 1 December 2000 as the first chief executive elected in free and fair elections.
Micronesia, Federated States of In 1979 the Federated States of Micronesia, a UN Trust Territory under US administration, adopted a constitution.
In 1986 independence was attained under a Compact of Free Association with the US.
Present concerns include large-scale unemployment, overfishing, and overdependence on US aid.
Midway Islands The US took formal possession of the islands in 1867.
The laying of the trans-Pacific cable, which passed through the islands, brought the first residents in 1903.
Between 1935 and 1947, Midway was used as a refueling stop for trans-Pacific flights.
The US naval victory over a Japanese fleet off Midway in 1942 was one of the turning points of World War II.
The islands continued to serve as a naval station until closed in 1993.
Today the islands are a national wildlife refuge.
From 1996 to 2001 the refuge was open to the public.
It is now temporarily closed.
Moldova Formerly ruled by Romania, Moldova became part of the Soviet Union at the close of World War II.
Although independent from the USSR since 1991, Russian forces have remained on Moldovan territory east of the Dniester River supporting the Slavic majority population, mostly Ukrainians and Russians, who have proclaimed a "Transnistria" republic.
One of the poorest nations in Europe, Moldova became the first former Soviet state to elect a Communist as its president in 2001.
Monaco Economic development was spurred in the late 19th century with a railroad linkup to France and the opening of a casino.
Since then, the principality's mild climate, splendid scenery, and gambling facilities have made Monaco world famous as a tourist and recreation center.
Mongolia The Mongols gained fame in the 13th century when under Genghis KHAN they conquered a huge Eurasian empire.
After his death the empire was divided into several powerful Mongol states, but these broke apart in the 14th century.
The Mongols eventually retired to their original steppe homelands and came under Chinese rule.
Mongolia won its independence in 1921 with Soviet backing.
A Communist regime was installed in 1924.
During the early 1990s, the ex-Communist Mongolian People's Revolutionary Party (MPRP) gradually yielded its monopoly on power to the Democratic Union Coalition (DUC), which defeated the MPRP in a national election in 1996.
Over the next four years, the DUC put forward a number of key reforms to modernize the economy and to democratize the political system.
The former Communists were a strong opposition that stalled additional restructuring and made implementation difficult.
In 2000, the MPRP won an overwhelming victory in the legislature - with 72 of the 76 seats - and completely reshuffled the government.
While it continues many of the reform policies, the MPRP has focused on social welfare and public order priorities.
Montserrat Much of this island has been devastated and two-thirds of the population has fled abroad due to the eruption of the Soufriere Hills volcano that began on 18 July 1995.
Morocco Morocco's long struggle for independence from France ended in 1956.
The internationalized city of Tangier was turned over to the new country that same year.
Morocco virtually annexed Western Sahara during the late 1970s, but final resolution on the status of the territory remains unresolved.
Gradual political reforms in the 1990s resulted in the establishment of a bicameral legislature in 1997.
Mozambique Almost five centuries as a Portuguese colony came to a close with independence in 1975.
Large-scale emigration by whites, economic dependence on South Africa, a severe drought, and a prolonged civil war hindered the country's development.
The ruling party formally abandoned Marxism in 1989, and a new constitution the following year provided for multiparty elections and a free market economy.
A UN-negotiated peace agreement with rebel forces ended the fighting in 1992.
Heavy flooding in both 1999 and 2000 severely hurt the economy.
Political stability and sound economic policies have encouraged recent foreign investment.
Namibia South Africa occupied the German colony of South-West Africa during World War I and administered it as a mandate until after World War II, when it annexed the territory.
In 1966 the Marxist South-West Africa People's Organization (SWAPO) guerrilla group launched a war of independence for the area that was soon named Namibia, but it was not until 1988 that South Africa agreed to end its administration in accordance with a UN peace plan for the entire region.
Independence came in 1990.
Nauru Nauru's phosphate deposits began to be mined early in the 20th century by a German-British consortium; the island was occupied by Australian forces in World War I. Nauru achieved independence in 1968 and joined the UN in 1999.
Nauru is the world's smallest independent republic.
Navassa Island This uninhabited island was claimed by the US in 1857 for its guano, and mining took place between 1865 and 1898.
The lighthouse, built in 1917, was shut down in 1996 and administration of Navassa Island transferred from the Coast Guard to the Department of the Interior.
A 1998 scientific expedition to the island described it as a unique preserve of Caribbean biodiversity; the following year it became a National Wildlife Refuge.
Nepal In 1951, the Nepalese monarch ended the century-old system of rule by hereditary premiers and instituted a cabinet system of government.
Reforms in 1990 established a multiparty democracy within the framework of a constitutional monarchy.
A Maoist insurgency, launched in 1996, has gained traction and is threatening to bring down the regime.
In 2001, the Crown Prince massacred ten members of the royal family, including the king and queen, and then took his own life.
In October 2002, the new king dismissed the prime minister and his cabinet for "incompetence" after they dissolved the parliament and were subsequently unable to hold elections because of the ongoing insurgency.
The country is now governed by the king and his appointed cabinet, which has negotiated a cease-fire with the Maoist insurgents, until elections can be held at some unspecified future date.
Netherlands The Kingdom of the Netherlands was formed in 1815.
In 1830 Belgium seceded and formed a separate kingdom.
The Netherlands remained neutral in World War I, but suffered invasion and occupation by Germany in World War II.
A modern, industrialized nation, the Netherlands is also a large exporter of agricultural products.
The country was a founding member of NATO and the EC (now the EU), and participated in the introduction of the Economic and Monetary Union (EMU) in 1999.
Netherlands Antilles Once the center of the Caribbean slave trade, the island of Curacao was hard hit by the abolition of slavery in 1863.
Its prosperity (and that of neighboring Aruba) was restored in the early 20th century with the construction of oil refineries to service the newly discovered Venezuelan oil fields.
The island of Saint Martin is shared with France; its northern portion is named Saint-Martin and is part of Guadeloupe, and its southern portion is named Sint Maarten and is part of the Netherlands Antilles.
New Caledonia Settled by both Britain and France during the first half of the 19th century, the island was made a French possession in 1853.
It served as a penal colony for four decades after 1864.
Agitation for independence during the 1980s and early 1990s seems to have dissipated.
New Zealand The Polynesian Maori reached New Zealand in about A.D. 800.
In 1840, their chieftains entered into a compact with Britain, the Treaty of Waitangi, in which they ceded sovereignty to Queen Victoria while retaining territorial rights.
In that same year, the British began the first organized colonial settlement.
A series of land wars between 1843 and 1872 ended with the defeat of the native peoples.
The British colony of New Zealand became an independent dominion in 1907 and supported the UK militarily in both World Wars.
New Zealand's full participation in a number of defense alliances lapsed by the 1980s.
In recent years, the government has sought to address longstanding Maori grievances.
Nicaragua The Pacific Coast of Nicaragua was settled as a Spanish colony from Panama in the early 16th century.
Independence from Spain was declared in 1821 and the country became an independent republic in 1838.
Britain occupied the Caribbean Coast in the first half of the 19th century, but gradually ceded control of the region in subsequent decades.
Violent opposition to governmental manipulation and corruption spread to all classes by 1978 and resulted in a short-lived civil war that brought the Marxist Sandinista guerrillas to power in 1979.
Nicaraguan aid to leftist rebels in El Salvador caused the US to sponsor anti-Sandinista contra guerrillas through much of the 1980s.
Free elections in 1990, 1996, and again in 2001 saw the Sandinistas defeated.
The country has slowly rebuilt its economy during the 1990s, but was hard hit by Hurricane Mitch in 1998.
Niger Not until 1993, 33 years after independence from France, did Niger hold it's first free and open elections.
A 1995 peace accord ended a five-year Tuareg insurgency in the north.
Coups in 1996 and 1999 were followed by the creation of a National Reconciliation Council that effected a transition to civilian rule by December 1999.
Nigeria Following nearly 16 years of military rule, a new constitution was adopted in 1999, and a peaceful transition to civilian government was completed.
The president faces the daunting task of rebuilding a petroleum-based economy, whose revenues have been squandered through corruption and mismanagement, and institutionalizing democracy.
In addition, the OBASANJO administration must defuse longstanding ethnic and religious tensions, if it is to build a sound foundation for economic growth and political stability.
Despite some irregularities the April 2003 elections marked the first civilian transfer of power in Nigeria's history.
Niue Niue's remoteness, as well as cultural and linguistic differences between its Polynesian inhabitants and those of the rest of the Cook Islands, have caused it to be separately administered.
The population of the island continues to drop (from a peak of 5,200 in 1966 to about 2,100 in 2002), with substantial emigration to New Zealand, 2,400 km to the southwest.
Norfolk Island Two British attempts at establishing the island as a penal colony (1788-1814 and 1825-55) were ultimately abandoned.
In 1856, the island was resettled by Pitcairn Islanders, descendants of the Bounty mutineers and their Tahitian companions.
Northern Mariana Islands Under US administration as part of the UN Trust Territory of the Pacific, the people of the Northern Mariana Islands decided in the 1970s not to seek independence but instead to forge closer links with the US.
Negotiations for territorial status began in 1972.
A covenant to establish a commonwealth in political union with the US was approved in 1975.
A new government and constitution went into effect in 1978.
Norway Two centuries of Viking raids into Europe tapered off following the adoption of Christianity by King Olav TRYGGVASON in 994.
Conversion of the Norwegian kingdom occurred over the next several decades.
In 1397, Norway was absorbed into a union with Denmark that was to last for more than four centuries.
In 1814, Norwegians resisted the cession of their country to Sweden and adopted a new constitution.
Sweden then invaded Norway but agreed to let Norway keep its constitution in return for accepting the union under a Swedish king.
Rising nationalism throughout the 19th century led to a 1905 referendum granting Norway independence.
Norway remained neutral in World War I and proclaimed its neutrality at the outset of World War II.
Nevertheless, it was not able to avoid a five-year occupation by Nazi Germany (1940-1945).
In 1949, neutrality was abandoned and Norway became a member of NATO.
Discovery of oil and gas in adjacent waters in the late 1960s boosted Norway's economic fortunes.
The current focus is on containing spending on the extensive welfare system and planning for the time when petroleum reserves are depleted.
In referenda held in 1972 and 1994, Norway rejected joining the EU. Oman In 1970, QABOOS bin Said Al Said ousted his father and has ruled as sultan ever since.
His extensive modernization program has opened the country to the outside world and has preserved a long-standing political and military relationship with the UK. Oman's moderate, independent foreign policy has sought to maintain good relations with all Middle Eastern countries.
Pacific Ocean The Pacific Ocean is the largest of the world's five oceans (followed by the Atlantic Ocean, Indian Ocean, Southern Ocean, and Arctic Ocean).
Strategically important access waterways include the La Perouse, Tsugaru, Tsushima, Taiwan, Singapore, and Torres Straits.
The decision by the International Hydrographic Organization in the spring of 2000 to delimit a fifth ocean, the Southern Ocean, removed the portion of the Pacific Ocean south of 60 degrees south.
Pakistan The separation in 1947 of British India into the Muslim state of Pakistan (with two sections West and East) and largely Hindu India was never satisfactorily resolved.
A third war between these countries in 1971 resulted in East Pakistan seceding and becoming the separate nation of Bangladesh.
A dispute over the state of Kashmir is ongoing.
In response to Indian nuclear weapons testing, Pakistan conducted its own tests in 1998.
Palau After three decades as part of the UN Trust Territory of the Pacific under US administration, this westernmost cluster of the Caroline Islands opted for independence in 1978 rather than join the Federated States of Micronesia.
A Compact of Free Association with the US was approved in 1986, but not ratified until 1993.
It entered into force the following year, when the islands gained independence.
Palmyra Atoll The Kingdom of Hawaii claimed the atoll in 1862, and the US included it among the Hawaiian Islands when it annexed the archipelago in 1898.
The Hawaii Statehood Act of 1959 did not include Palmyra Atoll, which is now privately owned by the Nature Conservancy.
This organization is managing the atoll as a nature preserve.
The lagoons and surrounding waters within the 12 nautical mile US territorial seas were transferred to the US Fish and Wildlife Service and were designated a National Wildlife Refuge in January 2001.
Panama With US backing, Panama seceded from Colombia in 1903 and promptly signed a treaty with the US allowing for the construction of a canal and US sovereignty over a strip of land on either side of the structure (the Panama Canal Zone).
The Panama Canal was built by the US Army Corps of Engineers between 1904 and 1914.
On 7 September 1977, an agreement was signed for the complete transfer of the Canal from the US to Panama by the end of 1999.
Certain portions of the Zone and increasing responsibility over the Canal were turned over in the intervening years.
With US help, dictator Manuel NORIEGA was deposed in 1989.
The entire Panama Canal, the area supporting the Canal, and remaining US military bases were turned over to Panama by or on 31 December 1999.
Papua New Guinea The eastern half of the island of New Guinea - second largest in the world - was divided between Germany (north) and the UK (south) in 1885.
The latter area was transferred to Australia in 1902, which occupied the northern portion during World War I and continued to administer the combined areas until independence in 1975.
A nine-year secessionist revolt on the island of Bougainville ended in 1997, after claiming some 20,000 lives.
Paracel Islands The Paracel Islands are surrounded by productive fishing grounds and by potential oil and gas reserves.
In 1932, French Indochina annexed the islands and set up a weather station on Pattle Island; maintenance was continued by its successor, Vietnam.
China has occupied the Paracel Islands since 1974, when its troops seized a South Vietnamese garrison occupying the western islands.
The islands are claimed by Taiwan and Vietnam.
Paraguay In the disastrous War of the Triple Alliance (1865-70), Paraguay lost two-thirds of all adult males and much of its territory.
It stagnated economically for the next half century.
In the Chaco War of 1932-35, large, economically important areas were won from Bolivia.
The 35-year military dictatorship of Alfredo STROESSNER was overthrown in 1989, and, despite a marked increase in political infighting in recent years, relatively free and regular presidential elections have been held since then.
Peru Ancient Peru was the seat of several prominent Andean civilizations, most notably that of the Incas whose empire was captured by the Spanish conquistadores in 1533.
Peruvian independence was declared in 1821, and remaining Spanish forces defeated in 1824.
After a dozen years of military rule, Peru returned to democratic leadership in 1980, but experienced economic problems and the growth of a violent insurgency.
President Alberto FUJIMORI's election in 1990 ushered in a decade that saw a dramatic turnaround in the economy and significant progress in curtailing guerrilla activity.
Nevertheless, the president's increasing reliance on authoritarian measures and an economic slump in the late 1990s generated mounting dissatisfaction with his regime.
FUJIMORI won reelection to a third term in the spring of 2000, but international pressure and corruption scandals led to his ouster by Congress in November of that year.
A caretaker government oversaw new elections in the spring of 2001, which ushered in Alejandro TOLEDO as the new head of government.
Philippines The Philippines were ceded by Spain to the US in 1898 following the Spanish-American War.
They attained independence in 1946 after Japanese occupation in World War II.
The 21-year rule of Ferdinand MARCOS ended in 1986, when a widespread popular rebellion forced him into exile.
In 1992, the US closed its last military bases on the islands.
The Philippines has had two electoral presidential transitions since the removal of MARCOS.
In January 2001, the Supreme Court declared Joseph ESTRADA unable to rule in view of mass resignations from his government and administered the oath of office to Vice President Gloria MACAPAGAL-ARROYO as his constitutional successor.
The government continues to struggle with Muslim insurgencies in the south.
Pitcairn Islands Pitcairn Island was discovered in 1767 by the British and settled in 1790 by the Bounty mutineers and their Tahitian companions.
Pitcairn was the first Pacific island to become a British colony (in 1838) and today remains the last vestige of that empire in the South Pacific.
Outmigration, primarily to New Zealand, has thinned the population from a peak of 233 in 1937 to less than 50 today.
Poland Poland is an ancient nation that was conceived around the middle of the 10th century.
Its golden age occurred in the 16th century.
During the following century, the strengthening of the gentry and internal disorders weakened the nation, until an agreement in 1772 between Russia, Prussia, and Austria partitioned Poland.
Poland regained its independence in 1918 only to be overrun by Germany and the Soviet Union in World War II.
It became a Soviet satellite state following the war, but its government was comparatively tolerant and progressive.
Labor turmoil in 1980 led to the formation of the independent trade union "Solidarity" that over time became a political force and by 1990 had swept parliamentary elections and the presidency.
A "shock therapy" program during the early 1990s enabled the country to transform its economy into one of the most robust in Central Europe, but Poland currently suffers low GDP growth and high unemployment.
Solidarity suffered a major defeat in the 2001 parliamentary elections when it failed to elect a single deputy to the lower house of Parliament, and the new leaders of the Solidarity Trade Union subsequently pledged to reduce the Trade Union's political role.
Poland joined NATO in 1999 and is scheduled to accede to the European Union along with nine other states on 1 May 2004.
Portugal Following its heyday as a world power during the 15th and 16th centuries, Portugal lost much of its wealth and status with the destruction of Lisbon in a 1755 earthquake, occupation during the Napoleonic Wars, and the independence in 1822 of Brazil as a colony.
A 1910 revolution deposed the monarchy; for most of the next six decades, repressive governments ran the country.
In 1974, a left-wing military coup installed broad democratic reforms.
The following year, Portugal granted independence to all of its African colonies.
Portugal entered the EC (now the EU) in 1986.
Puerto Rico Populated for centuries by aboriginal peoples, the island was claimed by the Spanish Crown in 1493 following Columbus' second voyage to the Americas.
In 1898, after 400 years of colonial rule that saw the indigenous population nearly exterminated and African slave labor introduced, Puerto Rico was ceded to the US as a result of the Spanish-American War.
Puerto Ricans were granted US citizenship in 1917 and popularly elected governors have served since 1948.
In 1952, a constitution was enacted providing for internal self-government.
In plebiscites held in 1967, 1993, and 1998 voters chose to retain commonwealth status.
Qatar Ruled by the Al Thani family since the mid-1800s, Qatar transformed itself from a poor British protectorate noted mainly for pearling into an independent state with significant oil and natural gas revenues.
During the late 1980s and early 1990s, the Qatari economy was crippled by a continuous siphoning off of petroleum revenues by the amir, who had ruled the country since 1972.
He was overthrown by his son, the current Amir HAMAD bin Khalifa Al Thani, in a bloodless coup in 1995.
In 2001, Qatar resolved its longstanding border disputes with both Bahrain and Saudi Arabia.
Oil and natural gas revenues enable Qatar to have a per capita income not far below the leading industrial countries of Western Europe.
Reunion The Portuguese discovered the uninhabited island in 1513.
From the 17th to the 19th centuries, French immigration, supplemented by influxes of Africans, Chinese, Malays, and Malabar Indians, gave the island its ethnic mix.
The opening of the Suez Canal in 1869 cost the island its importance as a stopover on the East Indies trade route.
Romania Soviet occupation following World War II led to the formation of a Communist "peoples republic" in 1947 and the abdication of the king.
The decades-long rule of dictator Nicolae CEAUSESCU, who took power in 1965, and his Securitate police state became increasingly oppressive and draconian through the 1980s.
CEAUSESCU was overthrown and executed in late 1989.
Former Communists dominated the government until 1996, when they were swept from power by a fractious coalition of centrist parties.
Currently, the Social Democratic Party forms a nominally minority government, which governs with the support of the opposition Democratic Union of Hungarians in Romania.
Bucharest must address rampant corruption, while invigorating lagging economic and democratic reforms, before Romania can achieve its hope of joining the European Union.
Russia Repeated devastating defeats of the Russian army in World War I led to widespread rioting in the major cities of the Russian Empire and to the overthrow in 1917 of the 300-year old Romanov Dynasty.
The Communists under Vladimir LENIN seized power soon after and formed the USSR.
The brutal rule of Josef STALIN (1928-53) strengthened Russian dominance of the Soviet Union at a cost of tens of millions of lives.
The Soviet economy and society stagnated in the following decades until General Secretary Mikhail GORBACHEV (1985-91) introduced glasnost (openness) and perestroika (restructuring) in an attempt to modernize Communism, but his initiatives inadvertently released forces that by December 1991 splintered the USSR into 15 independent republics.
Since then, Russia has struggled in its efforts to build a democratic political system and market economy to replace the strict social, political, and economic controls of the Communist period.
A determined guerrilla conflict still plagues Russia in Chechnya.
Rwanda In 1959, three years before independence from Belgium, the majority ethnic group, the Hutus, overthrew the ruling Tutsi king.
Over the next several years, thousands of Tutsis were killed, and some 150,000 driven into exile in neighboring countries.
The children of these exiles later formed a rebel group, the Rwandan Patriotic Front, and began a civil war in 1990.
The war, along with several political and economic upheavals, exacerbated ethnic tensions, culminating in April 1994 in the genocide of roughly 800,000 Tutsis and moderate Hutus.
The Tutsi rebels defeated the Hutu regime and ended the killing in July 1994, but approximately 2 million Hutu refugees - many fearing Tutsi retribution - fled to neighboring Burundi, Tanzania, Uganda, and Zaire.
Since then, most of the refugees have returned to Rwanda.
Despite substantial international assistance and political reforms - including Rwanda's first local elections in March 1999 - the country continues to struggle to boost investment and agricultural output and to foster reconciliation.
A series of massive population displacements, a nagging Hutu extremist insurgency, and Rwandan involvement in two wars over the past four years in the neighboring DROC continue to hinder Rwanda's efforts.
Saint Helena Uninhabited when first discovered by the Portuguese in 1502, Saint Helena was garrisoned by the British during the 17th century.
It acquired fame as the place of Napoleon BONAPARTE's exile, from 1815 until his death in 1821, but its importance as a port of call declined after the opening of the Suez Canal in 1869.
Ascension Island is the site of a US Air Force auxiliary airfield; Gough Island has a meteorological station.
Saint Kitts and Nevis First settled by the British in 1623, the islands became an associated state with full internal autonomy in 1967.
The island of Anguilla rebelled and was allowed to secede in 1971.
Saint Kitts and Nevis achieved independence in 1983.
In 1998, a vote in Nevis on a referendum to separate from Saint Kitts fell short of the two-thirds majority needed.
Saint Lucia The island, with its fine natural harbor at Castries, was contested between England and France throughout the 17th and early 18th centuries (changing possession 14 times); it was finally ceded to the UK in 1814.
Self-government was granted in 1967 and independence in 1979.
Saint Pierre and Miquelon First settled by the French in the early 17th century, the islands represent the sole remaining vestige of France's once vast North American possessions.
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines Disputed between France and the United Kingdom in the 18th century, Saint Vincent was ceded to the latter in 1783.
Autonomy was granted in 1969 and independence in 1979.
Samoa New Zealand occupied the German protectorate of Western Samoa at the outbreak of World War I in 1914.
It continued to administer the islands as a mandate and then as a trust territory until 1962, when the islands became the first Polynesian nation to reestablish independence in the 20th century.
The country dropped the "Western" from its name in 1997.
San Marino The third smallest state in Europe (after the Holy See and Monaco) also claims to be the world's oldest republic.
According to tradition, it was founded by a Christian stonemason named Marinus in 301 A.D. San Marino's foreign policy is aligned with that of Italy.
Social and political trends in the republic also track closely with those of its larger neighbor.
Sao Tome and Principe Discovered and claimed by Portugal in the late 15th century, the islands' sugar-based economy gave way to coffee and cocoa in the 19th century - all grown with plantation slave labor, a form of which lingered into the 20th century.
Although independence was achieved in 1975, democratic reforms were not instituted until the late 1980s.
The first free elections were held in 1991.
Saudi Arabia In 1902, ABD AL-AZIZ bin Abd al-Rahman Al Saud captured Riyadh and set out on a 30-year campaign to unify the Arabian Peninsula.
In the 1930s, the discovery of oil transformed the country.
Following Iraq's invasion of Kuwait in 1990, Saudi Arabia accepted the Kuwaiti royal family and 400,000 refugees while allowing Western and Arab troops to deploy on its soil for the liberation of Kuwait the following year.
A burgeoning population, aquifer depletion, and an economy largely dependent on petroleum output and prices are all major governmental concerns.
Senegal Independent from France in 1960, Senegal joined with The Gambia to form the nominal confederation of Senegambia in 1982.
However, the envisaged integration of the two countries was never carried out, and the union was dissolved in 1989.
Despite peace talks, a southern separatist group sporadically has clashed with government forces since 1982.
Senegal has a long history of participating in international peacekeeping.
Serbia and Montenegro The Kingdom of Serbs, Croats, and Slovenes was formed in 1918; its name was changed to Yugoslavia in 1929.
Occupation by Nazi Germany in 1941 was resisted by various paramilitary bands that fought themselves as well as the invaders.
The group headed by Marshal TITO took full control upon German expulsion in 1945.
Although Communist, his new government successfully steered its own path between the Warsaw Pact nations and the West for the next four and a half decades.
In the early 1990s, post-TITO Yugoslavia began to unravel along ethnic lines: Slovenia, Croatia, and The Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia all declared their independence in 1991; Bosnia and Herzegovina in 1992.
The remaining republics of Serbia and Montenegro declared a new "Federal Republic of Yugoslavia" (FRY) in 1992 and, under President Slobodan MILOSEVIC, Serbia led various military intervention efforts to unite Serbs in neighboring republics into a "Greater Serbia."
All of these efforts were ultimately unsuccessful.
In 1999, massive expulsions by FRY forces and Serb paramilitaries of ethnic Albanians living in Kosovo provoked an international response, including the NATO bombing of Serbia and the stationing of NATO, Russian, and other peacekeepers in Kosovo.
Federal elections in the fall of 2000, brought about the ouster of MILOSEVIC and installed Vojislav KOSTUNICA as president.
The arrest of MILOSEVIC in 2001 allowed for his subsequent transfer to the International Criminal Tribunal for the Former Yugoslavia in The Hague to be tried for crimes against humanity.
In 2001, the country's suspension was lifted, and it was once more accepted into UN organizations under the name of Yugoslavia.
Kosovo has been governed by the UN Interim Administration Mission in Kosovo (UNMIK) since June 1999, under the authority of UN Security Council Resolution 1244.
In 2002, the Serbian and Montenegrin components of Yugoslavia began negotiations to forge a looser relationship.
These talks became a reality in February 2003 when lawmakers restructured the country into a loose federation of two republics called Serbia and Montenegro.
An agreement was also reached to hold a referendum in each republic in three years on full independence.
Seychelles A lengthy struggle between France and Great Britain for the islands ended in 1814, when they were ceded to the latter.
Independence came in 1976.
Socialist rule was brought to a close with a new constitution and free elections in 1993.
The most recent presidential elections were held 31 August-2 September 2001.
President RENE, who has served since 1977, was re-elected.
Sierra Leone Since 1991, civil war between the government and the Revolutionary United Front (RUF) has resulted in tens of thousands of deaths and the displacement of more than 2 million people (well over one-third of the population), many of whom are now refugees in neighboring countries.
After several setbacks, the end to the 11-year conflict in Sierra Leone may finally be near at hand.
With the support of the UN peacekeeping force and contributions from the World Bank and international community, demobilization and disarmament of the RUF and Civil Defense Forces (CDF) combatants has been completed.
National elections were held in May 2002 and the government continues to slowly reestablish its authority.
Singapore Singapore was founded as a British trading colony in 1819.
It joined the Malaysian Federation in 1963 but separated two years later and became independent.
It subsequently became one of the world's most prosperous countries with strong international trading links (its port is one of the world's busiest) and with per capita GDP equal to that of the leading nations of Western Europe.
Slovakia In 1918 the Slovaks joined the closely related Czechs to form Czechoslovakia.
Following the chaos of World War II, Czechoslovakia became a Communist nation within Soviet-ruled Eastern Europe.
Soviet influence collapsed in 1989 and Czechoslovakia once more became free.
The Slovaks and the Czechs agreed to separate peacefully on 1 January 1993.
Slovakia was invited to join NATO and the EU in 2002.
Slovenia The Slovene lands were part of the Holy Roman Empire and Austria until 1918 when the Slovenes joined the Serbs and Croats in forming a new nation, renamed Yugoslavia in 1929.
After World War II, Slovenia became a republic of the renewed Yugoslavia, which though Communist, distanced itself from Moscow's rule.
Dissatisfied with the exercise of power of the majority Serbs, the Slovenes succeeded in establishing their independence in 1991 after a short 10-day war.
Historical ties to Western Europe, a strong economy, and a stable democracy have assisted in Slovenia's transformation to a modern state.
In December 2002, Slovenia received an invitation to join NATO, and it is scheduled to accede to the EU along with nine other states on 1 May 2004.
In a March 2003 referendum on NATO and EU membership, Slovenes voted 90% in favor of joining the EU and 66% in favor of joining NATO.
Solomon Islands The UK established a protectorate over the Solomon Islands in the 1890s.
Some of the bitterest fighting of World War II occurred on these islands.
Self-government was achieved in 1976 and independence two years later.
Ethnic violence, government malfeasance, and endemic crime have undermined stability and civil society.
Somalia The SIAD BARRE regime was ousted in January 1991; turmoil, factional fighting, and anarchy have followed for twelve years.
In May of 1991, northern clans declared an independent Republic of Somaliland that now includes the administrative regions of Awdal, Woqooyi Galbeed, Togdheer, Sanaag, and Sool.
Although not recognized by any government, this entity has maintained a stable existence, aided by the overwhelming dominance of a ruling clan and economic infrastructure left behind by British, Russian, and American military assistance programs.
The regions of Bari and Nugaal and northern Mudug comprise a neighboring self-declared autonomous state of Puntland, which has been self-governing since 1998, but does not aim at independence; it has also made strides towards reconstructing a legitimate, representative government, but has suffered civil strife in 2002.
Puntland disputes its border with Somaliland as it also claims portions of eastern Sool and Sanaag.
Beginning in 1993, a two-year UN humanitarian effort (primarily in the south) was able to alleviate famine conditions, but when the UN withdrew in 1995, having suffered significant casualties, order still had not been restored.
The mandate of the Transitional National Government (TNG), created in August 2000 in Arta, Djibouti, expires in August 2003 and a new interim government was being created at peace talks held in Kenya.
Numerous warlords and factions are still fighting for control of Mogadishu and the other southern regions.
Suspicion of Somali links with global terrorism further complicates the picture.
South Africa After the British seized the Cape of Good Hope area in 1806, many of the Dutch settlers (the Boers) trekked north to found their own republics.
The discovery of diamonds (1867) and gold (1886) spurred wealth and immigration and intensified the subjugation of the native inhabitants.
The Boers resisted British encroachments, but were defeated in the Boer War (1899-1902).
The resulting Union of South Africa operated under a policy of apartheid - the separate development of the races.
The 1990s brought an end to apartheid politically and ushered in black majority rule.
South Georgia and the South Sandwich Islands The islands lie approximately 1,000 km east of the Falkland Islands and have been under British administration since 1908, except for a brief period in 1982 when Argentina occupied them.
Grytviken, on South Georgia, was a 19th and early 20th century whaling station.
Famed explorer Ernest SHACKLETON stopped there in 1914 en route to his ill-fated attempt to cross Antarctica on foot.
He returned some 20 months later with a few companions in a small boat and arranged a successful rescue for the rest of his crew, stranded off the Antarctic Peninsula.
He died in 1922 on a subsequent expedition and is buried in Grytviken.
Today, the station houses scientists from the British Antarctic Survey.
The islands have large bird and seal populations, and, recognizing the importance of preserving the marine stocks in adjacent waters, the UK, in 1993, extended the exclusive fishing zone from 12 NM to 200 NM around each island.
Southern Ocean A decision by the International Hydrographic Organization in the spring of 2000 delimited a fifth world ocean - the Southern Ocean - from the southern portions of the Atlantic Ocean, Indian Ocean, and Pacific Ocean.
The Southern Ocean extends from the coast of Antarctica north to 60 degrees south latitude, which coincides with the Antarctic Treaty Limit.
The Southern Ocean is now the fourth largest of the world's five oceans (after the Pacific Ocean, Atlantic Ocean, and Indian Ocean, but larger than the Arctic Ocean).
Spain Spain's powerful world empire of the 16th and 17th centuries ultimately yielded command of the seas to England.
Subsequent failure to embrace the mercantile and industrial revolutions caused the country to fall behind Britain, France, and Germany in economic and political power.
Spain remained neutral in World Wars I and II, but suffered through a devastating civil war (1936-39).
In the second half of the 20th century, Spain has played a catch-up role in the western international community; it joined the EU in 1986.
Continuing concerns are Basque Fatherland and Liberty (ETA) terrorism and further reductions in unemployment.
Spratly Islands The Spratly Islands consist of more than 100 small islands or reefs.
They are surrounded by rich fishing grounds and potentially by gas and oil deposits.
They are claimed in their entirety by China, Taiwan, and Vietnam, while portions are claimed by Malaysia and the Philippines.
About 50 islands are occupied by China (about 450 soldiers), Malaysia (70-90), the Philippines (about 100), and Vietnam (about 1,500).
Brunei is a claimant but has no outposts.
(2002) Sri Lanka The Sinhalese arrived in Sri Lanka late in the 6th century B.C., probably from northern India.
Buddhism was introduced beginning in about the mid-third century B.C., and a great civilization developed at the cities of Anuradhapura (kingdom from circa 200 B.C. to circa 1000 A.D.) and Polonnaruwa (from about 1070 to 1200).
In the 14th century, a south Indian dynasty seized power in the north and established a Tamil kingdom.
Occupied by the Portuguese in the 16th century and by the Dutch in the 17th century, the island was ceded to the British in 1796, became a crown colony in 1802, and was united under British rule by 1815.
As Ceylon, it became independent in 1948; its name was changed to Sri Lanka in 1972.
Tensions between the Sinhalese majority and Tamil separatists erupted in violence in the mid-1980s.
Tens of thousands have died in an ethnic war that continues to fester.
After two decades of fighting, the government and Liberation Tigers of Tamil Eelam began a ceasefire in December 2001, with Norway brokering peace negotiations.
Sudan Military regimes favoring Islamic-oriented governments have dominated national politics since independence from the UK in 1956.
Sudan has been embroiled in a civil war for all but 10 years of this period (1972-82).
The wars are rooted in northern economic, political, and social domination of non-Muslim, non-Arab southern Sudanese.
Since 1983, the war and war- and famine-related effects have led to more than 2 million deaths and over 4 million people displaced.
The ruling regime is a mixture of military elite and an Islamist party that came to power in a 1989 coup.
Some northern opposition parties have made common cause with the southern rebels and entered the war as a part of an anti-government alliance.
Peace talks gained momentum in 2002-03 with the signing of several accords, including a cease-fire agreement.
Suriname Independence from the Netherlands was granted in 1975.
Five years later the civilian government was replaced by a military regime that soon declared a socialist republic.
It continued to rule through a succession of nominally civilian administrations until 1987, when international pressure finally forced a democratic election.
In 1989, the military overthrew the civilian government, but a democratically-elected government returned to power in 1991.
Svalbard First discovered by the Norwegians in the 12th century, the islands served as an international whaling base during the 17th and 18th centuries.
Norway's sovereignty was recognized in 1920; five years later it officially took over the territory.
Swaziland Autonomy for the Swazis of southern Africa was guaranteed by the British in the late 19th century; independence was granted 1968.
Student and labor unrest during the 1990s have pressured the monarchy (one of the oldest on the continent) to grudgingly allow political reform and greater democracy.
Sweden A military power during the 17th century, Sweden has not participated in any war in almost two centuries.
An armed neutrality was preserved in both World Wars.
Sweden's long-successful economic formula of a capitalist system interlarded with substantial welfare elements was challenged in the 1990s by high unemployment, rising maintenance costs, and a declining position in world markets.
Indecision over the country's role in the political and economic integration of Europe delayed Sweden's entry into the EU until 1995, and waived the introduction of the euro in 1999.
Switzerland Switzerland's independence and neutrality have long been honored by the major European powers, and Switzerland was not involved in either of the two World Wars.
The political and economic integration of Europe over the past half century, as well as Switzerland's role in many UN and international organizations, has strengthened Switzerland's ties with its neighbors.
However, the country did not officially become a UN member until 2002.
Switzerland remains active in many UN and international organizations, but retains a strong commitment to neutrality.
Syria Following the breakup of the Ottoman Empire during World War I, Syria was administered by the French until independence in 1946.
In the 1967 Arab-Israeli War, Syria lost the Golan Heights to Israel.
Since 1976, Syrian troops have been stationed in Lebanon, ostensibly in a peacekeeping capacity.
In recent years, Syria and Israel have held occasional peace talks over the return of the Golan Heights.
Taiwan In 1895, military defeat forced China to cede Taiwan to Japan.
It reverted to Chinese control after World War II.
Following the Communist victory on the mainland in 1949, 2 million Nationalists fled to Taiwan and established a government using the 1947 constitution drawn up for all of China.
Over the next five decades, the ruling authorities gradually democratized and incorporated the native population within the governing structure.
In 2000, Taiwan underwent its first peaceful transfer of power from the Nationalist to the Democratic Progressive Party.
Throughout this period, the island prospered and became one of East Asia's economic "Tigers."
The dominant political issues continue to be the relationship between Taiwan and China - specifically the question of eventual unification - as well as domestic political and economic reform.
Tajikistan Tajikistan has experienced three changes in government and a five-year civil war since it gained independence in 1991 from the USSR.
A peace agreement among rival factions was signed in 1997, and implemented in 2000.
The central government's less than total control over some areas of the country has forced it to compromise and forge alliances among factions.
Attention by the international community in the wake of the war in Afghanistan has brought increased economic development assistance, which could create jobs and increase stability in the long term.
Tajikistan is in the early stages of seeking World Trade Organization membership and has joined NATO's Partnership for Peace.
Tanzania Shortly after independence, Tanganyika and Zanzibar merged to form the nation of Tanzania in 1964.
One-party rule came to an end in 1995 with the first democratic elections held in the country since the 1970s.
Zanzibar's semi-autonomous status and popular opposition have led to two contentious elections since 1995, which the ruling party won despite international observers' claims of voting irregularities.
Thailand A unified Thai kingdom was established in the mid-14th century.
Known as Siam until 1939, Thailand is the only Southeast Asian country never to have been taken over by a European power.
A bloodless revolution in 1932 led to a constitutional monarchy.
In alliance with Japan during World War II, Thailand became a US ally following the conflict.
Togo French Togoland became Togo in 1960.
Gen. Gnassingbe EYADEMA, installed as military ruler in 1967, is Africa's longest-serving head of state.
Despite the facade of multiparty elections instituted in the early 1990s, the government continues to be dominated by President EYADEMA, whose Rally of the Togolese People (RPT) party has maintained power almost continually since 1967.
In addition, Togo has come under fire from international organizations for human rights abuses and is plagued by political unrest.
Most bilateral and multilateral aid to Togo remains frozen.
Tokelau Originally settled by Polynesian emigrants from surrounding island groups, the Tokelau Islands were made a British protectorate in 1889.
They were transferred to New Zealand administration in 1925.
Tonga The archipelago of "The Friendly Islands" was united into a Polynesian kingdom in 1845.
It became a constitutional monarchy in 1875 and a British protectorate in 1900.
Tonga acquired its independence in 1970 and became a member of the Commonwealth of Nations.
It remains the only monarchy in the Pacific.
Trinidad and Tobago The islands came under British control in the 19th century; independence was granted in 1962.
The country is one of the most prosperous in the Caribbean, thanks largely to petroleum and natural gas production and processing.
Tourism, mostly in Tobago, is targeted for expansion and is growing.
Tromelin Island First explored by the French in 1776, the island came under the jurisdiction of Reunion in 1814.
At present, it serves as a sea turtle sanctuary and is the site of an important meteorological station.
Tunisia Following independence from France in 1956, President Habib BOURGUIBA established a strict one-party state.
He dominated the country for 31 years, repressing Islamic fundamentalism and establishing rights for women unmatched by any other Arab nation.
In recent years, Tunisia has taken a moderate, non-aligned stance in its foreign relations.
Domestically, it has sought to diffuse rising pressure for a more open political society.
Turkey Present-day Turkey was created in 1923 from the Turkish remnants of the Ottoman Empire.
Soon thereafter, the country instituted secular laws to replace traditional religious fiats.
In 1945 Turkey joined the UN, and in 1952 it became a member of NATO.
Turkey intervened militarily on Cyprus in 1974 to protect Turkish Cypriots and prevent a Greek takeover of the island; the northern 37 percent of the island remains under Turkish Cypriot control.
Relations between the two countries remain strained, but have begun to improve over the past few years.
In 1984, the Kurdistan Workers' Party (PKK), a Marxist-Leninist, separatist group, initiated an insurgency in southeast Turkey, often using terrorist tactics to try to attain its goal of an independent Kurdistan.
The group - whose leader, Abdullah OCALAN, was captured in Kenya in February 1999 - has observed a unilateral cease-fire since September 1999, although there have been occasional clashes between Turkish military units and some of the 4,000-5,000 armed PKK militants, most of whom currently are encamped in northern Iraq.
The PKK changed its name to the Kurdistan Freedom and Democracy Congress (KADEK) in April 2002.
Turkmenistan Annexed by Russia between 1865 and 1885, Turkmenistan became a Soviet republic in 1925.
It achieved its independence upon the dissolution of the USSR in 1991.
President NIYAZOV retains absolute control over the country and opposition is not tolerated.
Extensive hydrocarbon/natural gas reserves could prove a boon to this underdeveloped country if extraction and delivery projects can be worked out.
Turks and Caicos Islands The islands were part of the UK's Jamaican colony until 1962, when they assumed the status of a separate crown colony upon Jamaica's independence.
The governor of The Bahamas oversaw affairs from 1965 to 1973.
With Bahamian independence, the islands received a separate governor in 1973.
Although independence was agreed upon for 1982, the policy was reversed and the islands are presently a British overseas territory.
Tuvalu In 1974, ethnic differences within the British colony of the Gilbert and Ellice Islands caused the Polynesians of the Ellice Islands to vote for separation from the Micronesians of the Gilbert Islands.
The following year, the Ellice Islands became the separate British colony of Tuvalu.
Independence was granted in 1978.
In 2000, Tuvalu negotiated a contract leasing its Internet domain name ".tv" for $50 million in royalties over the next dozen years.
Uganda Uganda achieved independence from the UK in 1962.
The dictatorial regime of Idi AMIN (1971-79) was responsible for the deaths of some 300,000 opponents; guerrilla war and human rights abuses under Milton OBOTE (1980-85) claimed at least another 100,000 lives.
During the 1990s, the government promulgated non-party presidential and legislative elections.
Ukraine Ukraine was the center of the first Slavic state, Kievan Rus, which during the 10th and 11th centuries was the largest and most powerful state in Europe.
Weakened by internecine quarrels and Mongol invasions, Kievan Rus was incorporated into the Grand Duchy of Lithuania and eventually into the Polish-Lithuanian Commonwealth.
The cultural and religious legacy of Kievan Rus laid the foundation for Ukrainian nationalism through subsequent centuries.
A new Ukrainian state, the Cossack Hetmanate, was established during the mid-17th century after an uprising against the Poles.
Despite continuous Muscovite pressure, the Hetmanate managed to remain autonomous for well over 100 years.
During the latter part of the 18th century, most Ukrainian ethnographic territory was absorbed by the Russian Empire.
Following the collapse of czarist Russia in 1917, Ukraine was able to bring about a short-lived period of independence (1917-1920), but was reconquered and forced to endure a brutal Soviet rule that engineered two artificial famines (1921-22 and 1932-33) in which over 8 million died.
In World War II, German and Soviet armies were responsible for some 7 to 8 million more deaths.
Although independence was achieved in 1991 with the dissolution of the USSR, true freedom remains elusive, as many of the former Soviet elite remain entrenched, stalling efforts at economic reform, privatization, and civil liberties.
United Arab Emirates The Trucial States of the Persian Gulf coast granted the UK control of their defense and foreign affairs in 19th century treaties.
In 1971, six of these states - Abu Zaby, 'Ajman, Al Fujayrah, Ash Shariqah, Dubayy, and Umm al Qaywayn - merged to form the United Arab Emirates (UAE).
They were joined in 1972 by Ra's al Khaymah.
The UAE's per capita GDP is not far below those of leading West European nations.
Its generosity with oil revenues and its moderate foreign policy stance have allowed the UAE to play a vital role in the affairs of the region.
United Kingdom Great Britain, the dominant industrial and maritime power of the 19th century, played a leading role in developing parliamentary democracy and in advancing literature and science.
At its zenith, the British Empire stretched over one-fourth of the earth's surface.
The first half of the 20th century saw the UK's strength seriously depleted in two World Wars.
The second half witnessed the dismantling of the Empire and the UK rebuilding itself into a modern and prosperous European nation.
As one of five permanent members of the UN Security Council, a founding member of NATO, and of the Commonwealth, the UK pursues a global approach to foreign policy; it currently is weighing the degree of its integration with continental Europe.
A member of the EU, it chose to remain outside the European Monetary Union for the time being.
Constitutional reform is also a significant issue in the UK.
The Scottish Parliament, the National Assembly for Wales, and the Northern Ireland Assembly were established in 1999.
United States Britain's American colonies broke with the mother country in 1776 and were recognized as the new nation of the United States of America following the Treaty of Paris in 1783.
During the 19th and 20th centuries, 37 new states were added to the original 13 as the nation expanded across the North American continent and acquired a number of overseas possessions.
The two most traumatic experiences in the nation's history were the Civil War (1861-65) and the Great Depression of the 1930s.
Buoyed by victories in World Wars I and II and the end of the Cold War in 1991, the US remains the world's most powerful nation-state.
The economy is marked by steady growth, low unemployment and inflation, and rapid advances in technology.
Uruguay A violent Marxist urban guerrilla movement, the Tupamaros, launched in the late 1960s, led Uruguay's president to agree to military control of his administration in 1973.
By yearend, the rebels had been crushed, but the military continued to expand its hold throughout the government.
Civilian rule was not restored until 1985.
Uruguay's political and labor conditions are among the freest on the continent.
Uzbekistan Russia conquered Uzbekistan in the late 19th century.
Stiff resistance to the Red Army after World War I was eventually suppressed and a socialist republic set up in 1924.
During the Soviet era, intensive production of "white gold" (cotton) and grain led to overuse of agrochemicals and the depletion of water supplies, which have left the land poisoned and the Aral Sea and certain rivers half dry.
Independent since 1991, the country seeks to gradually lessen its dependence on agriculture while developing its mineral and petroleum reserves.
Current concerns include terrorism by Islamic militants, a nonconvertible currency, and the curtailment of human rights and democratization.
Vanuatu The British and French, who settled the New Hebrides in the 19th century, agreed in 1906 to an Anglo-French Condominium, which administered the islands until independence in 1980.
Venezuela Venezuela was one of three countries that emerged from the collapse of Gran Colombia in 1830 (the others being Colombia and Ecuador).
For most of the first half of the 20th century, Venezuela was ruled by generally benevolent military strongmen, who promoted the oil industry and allowed for some social reforms.
Democratically elected governments have held sway since 1959.
Current concerns include: an embattled president who is losing his once solid support among Venezuelans, a divided military, drug-related conflicts along the Colombian border, increasing internal drug consumption, overdependence on the petroleum industry with its price fluctuations, and irresponsible mining operations that are endangering the rain forest and indigenous peoples.
Vietnam France occupied all of Vietnam by 1884.
Independence was declared after World War II, but the French continued to rule until 1954 when they were defeated by Communist forces under Ho Chi MINH, who took control of the North.
US economic and military aid to South Vietnam grew through the 1960s in an attempt to bolster the government, but US armed forces were withdrawn following a cease-fire agreement in 1973.
Two years later, North Vietnamese forces overran the South.
Economic reconstruction of the reunited country has proven difficult as aging Communist Party leaders have only grudgingly initiated reforms necessary for a free market.
Virgin Islands During the 17th century, the archipelago was divided into two territorial units, one English and the other Danish.
Sugarcane, produced by slave labor, drove the islands' economy during the 18th and early 19th centuries.
In 1917, the US purchased the Danish portion, which had been in economic decline since the abolition of slavery in 1848.
Wake Island The US annexed Wake Island in 1899 for a cable station.
An important air and naval base was constructed in 1940-41.
In December 1941, the island was captured by the Japanese and held until the end of World War II.
In subsequent years, Wake was developed as a stopover and refueling site for military and commercial aircraft transiting the Pacific.
Since 1974, the island's airstrip has been used by the US military and some commercial cargo planes, as well as for emergency landings.
There are over 700 landings a year on the island.
Wallis and Futuna Although discovered by the Dutch and the British in the 17th and 18th centuries, it was the French who declared a protectorate over the islands in 1842.
In 1959, the inhabitants of the islands voted to become a French overseas territory.
West Bank The Israel-PLO Declaration of Principles on Interim Self-Government Arrangements (the DOP), signed in Washington on 13 September 1993, provided for a transitional period not exceeding five years of Palestinian interim self-government in the Gaza Strip and the West Bank.
Under the DOP, Israel agreed to transfer certain powers and responsibilities to the Palestinian Authority, which includes the Palestinian Legislative Council elected in January 1996, as part of the interim self-governing arrangements in the West Bank and Gaza Strip.
A transfer of powers and responsibilities for the Gaza Strip and Jericho took place pursuant to the Israel-PLO 4 May 1994 Cairo Agreement on the Gaza Strip and the Jericho Area and in additional areas of the West Bank pursuant to the Israel-PLO 28 September 1995 Interim Agreement, the Israel-PLO 15 January 1997 Protocol Concerning Redeployment in Hebron, the Israel-PLO 23 October 1998 Wye River Memorandum, and the 4 September 1999 Sharm el-Sheikh Agreement.
The DOP provides that Israel will retain responsibility during the transitional period for external security and for internal security and public order of settlements and Israeli citizens.
Direct negotiations to determine the permanent status of Gaza and West Bank had begun in September 1999 after a three-year hiatus, but have been derailed by a second intifadah that broke out in September 2000.
The resulting widespread violence in the West Bank and Gaza Strip, Israel's military response, and instability within the Palestinian Authority continue to undermine progress toward a permanent agreement.
Western Sahara Morocco virtually annexed the northern two-thirds of Western Sahara (formerly Spanish Sahara) in 1976, and the rest of the territory in 1979, following Mauritania's withdrawal.
A guerrilla war with the Polisario Front contesting Rabat's sovereignty ended in a 1991 UN-brokered cease-fire; a UN-organized referendum on final status has been repeatedly postponed.
World Globally, the 20th century was marked by: (a) two devastating world wars; (b) the Great Depression of the 1930s; (c) the end of vast colonial empires; (d) rapid advances in science and technology, from the first airplane flight at Kitty Hawk, North Carolina (US) to the landing on the moon; (e) the Cold War between the Western alliance and the Warsaw Pact nations; (f) a sharp rise in living standards in North America, Europe, and Japan; (g) increased concerns about the environment, including loss of forests, shortages of energy and water, the decline in biological diversity, and air pollution; (h) the onset of the AIDS epidemic; and (i) the ultimate emergence of the US as the only world superpower.
The planet's population continues to explode: from 1 billion in 1820, to 2 billion in 1930, 3 billion in 1960, 4 billion in 1974, 5 billion in 1988, and 6 billion in 2000.
For the 21st century, the continued exponential growth in science and technology raises both hopes (e.g., advances in medicine) and fears (e.g., development of even more lethal weapons of war).
Yemen North Yemen became independent of the Ottoman Empire in 1918.
The British, who had set up a protectorate area around the southern port of Aden in the 19th century, withdrew in 1967 from what became South Yemen.
Three years later, the southern government adopted a Marxist orientation.
The massive exodus of hundreds of thousands of Yemenis from the south to the north contributed to two decades of hostility between the states.
The two countries were formally unified as the Republic of Yemen in 1990.
A southern secessionist movement in 1994 was quickly subdued.
In 2000, Saudi Arabia and Yemen agreed to a delimitation of their border.
Zambia The territory of Northern Rhodesia was administered by the South Africa Company from 1891 until it was taken over by the UK in 1923.
During the 1920s and 1930s, advances in mining spurred development and immigration.
The name was changed to Zambia upon independence in 1964.
In the 1980s and 1990s, declining copper prices and a prolonged drought hurt the economy.
Elections in 1991 brought an end to one-party rule, but the subsequent vote in 1996 saw blatant harassment of opposition parties.
The election in 2001 was marked by administrative problems with three parties filing a legal petition challenging the election of ruling party candidate Levy MWANAWASA.
The new president launched a far-reaching anti-corruption campaign in 2002, which resulted in the 2003 arrest of the previous president Frederick CHILUBA and many of his supporters.
Opposition parties currently hold a majority of seats in the National Assembly.
Zimbabwe The UK annexed Southern Rhodesia from the South Africa Company in 1923.
A 1961 constitution was formulated that favored whites in power.
In 1965 the government unilaterally declared its independence, but the UK did not recognize the act and demanded more complete voting rights for the black African majority in the country (then called Rhodesia).
UN sanctions and a guerrilla uprising finally led to free elections in 1979 and independence (as Zimbabwe) in 1980.
Robert MUGABE, the nation's first prime minister, has been the country's only ruler (as president since 1987) and has dominated the country's political system since independence.
His chaotic land redistribution campaign begun in 2000 caused an exodus of white farmers, crippled the economy, and ushered in widespread shortages of basic commodities.
Ignoring international condemnation, MUGABE rigged the 2002 presidential election to ensure his reelection.
Opposition and labor groups launched general strikes in 2003 to pressure MUGABE to retire early; security forces continued their brutal repression of regime opponents.
This page was last updated on 1 August, 2003 Bottom Banner
